RESEARCH  AND  DEVELOPMENT  TO  PROTECT 
AMERICA’S  COMMUNITIES  FROM  DISASTER

S.  HRG.  109–293

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER PREVENTION AND 

PREDICTION

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JUNE  8,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

25–862 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  DISASTER  PREVENTION  AND  PREDICTION 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska,  Ranking 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 8, 2005 .................................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint .................................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain .................................................................................
Statement of Senator E. Benjamin Nelson ............................................................

WITNESSES 

Bement, Jr., Dr. Arden L., Director, National Science Foundation .....................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Lautenbacher  Jr.,  Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C.,  U.S.  Navy  (Retired),  Under  Sec-
retary of Commerce for Oceans and Atmosphere; Administrator, NOAA .......
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Semerjian,  Dr.  Hratch  G.,  Acting  Director,  National  Institute  of  Standards 
and Technology, Technology Administration, Department of Commerce ........
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
1
33
25

19
21

10
13

3
5

Inouye, Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement ....................

37

APPENDIX 

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

RESEARCH  AND  DEVELOPMENT  TO  PROTECT 

AMERICA’S  COMMUNITIES  FROM  DISASTER 

WEDNESDAY,  JUNE  8,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEE ON DISASTER PREVENTION AND 
PREDICTION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:30  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Jim  DeMint,
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT,

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator DEMINT. Let’s call the hearing to order. This is the first 
hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Disaster  Prevention  and  Pre-
diction.  I  think  we’ve  got  a  Ranking  Member  on  the  way  here,  but 
we’ll  go  ahead  and  get  started,  as  a  courtesy  to  our  witnesses  who 
are here. 

This  afternoon,  we  are  going  to  be  focusing  the  Subcommittee’s 
attention on the role that the agencies under the jurisdiction of the 
Commerce Committee play in supporting the national homeland se-
curity  mission.  As  we  are  all  aware,  September  11  profoundly 
changed  America.  Before  the  attacks  on  New  York,  Washington, 
and  Pennsylvania,  counterterrorism  was  largely  the  concern  of 
other  countries.  Foreign  nations  were  preoccupied  with  defeating 
the  threat  from  groups  like  the  Red  Army  Faction,  the  Shining 
Path,  the  Real  IRA.  And  while  the  United  States  monitored  these 
groups,  the  true  fighting  largely  fell  to  other  nations.  That  has  all 
changed. 

As a part of the Nation’s response to September 11, the President 
and  the  Congress  created  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security. 
This  agency  combined  the  intelligence,  law  enforcement,  moni-
toring,  first-response,  and  scientific  capabilities  of  numerous  fed-
eral agencies under one roof. I am confident that the consolidation 
of these agencies at the Department of Homeland Security will en-
hance the Nation’s efforts to protect the homeland. 

While the Department represents a significant improvement over 
the  multi-agency  approach  before  9/11,  the  Department  is  not  the 
only  federal  entity  contributing  to  the  Nation’s  response  to  the 
threat  posed  by  the  international  terrorist  organizations.  Many 
non-Defense,  and  non-Homeland-Security  agencies  play  a  crucial 
role in preventing and preparing for the threat posed by terrorists. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

This  is  particularly  true  in  the  scientific  research  community, 
where  significant  portions  of  homeland  security  research  is  per-
formed outside the Department of Homeland Security. Specifically, 
the  National  Institute  for  Standards  and  Technology,  the  National 
Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and the National Science 
Foundation are appearing this afternoon to discuss how their work 
supports the homeland security science-and-technology efforts. 

All of these agencies had robust research programs in place long 
before September 11. They were able to transition and adjust their 
research  regimes  quickly  so  they  could  respond  to  the  new  threat 
while still supporting their fundamental core mission. 

NIST, which grew out of the Bureau of Standards, has long been 
responsible  for  helping  establish  the  processes  and  standards  that 
ensure that devices operate in a manner consistent with their pur-
pose  and  design.  For  example,  it’s  critically  important  that  a  tool, 
such  as  a  radiation  detector  used  by  a  firefighter,  behaves  as  ex-
pected when deployed in the field. 

NOAA’s  mission  has  always  been  monitoring  the  ocean  and  at-
mosphere,  and  warning  communities  when  there  is  a  threat. 
NOAA’s  expertise  in  observing  the  weather  in  local  communities, 
as  well  as  their  work  in  developing  atmospheric  models,  provides 
an  invaluable  tool  to  the  local  first-responders  in  the  event  of  a 
hazardous  chemical  release  in  one  of  our  communities.  For  exam-
ple, earlier this year the weather forecast office in Columbia, South 
Carolina, played a crucial role in providing weather inputs into the 
atmospheric  models  used  during  a  chlorine  release  from  a  train 
wreck in Graniteville. While this was not a terrorist attack, the re-
sources and cooperation between NOAA, the Department of Home-
land  Security,  and  the  first-responders  provide  an  example  of  how 
the agencies can work together in response to a disaster. 

Finally, NSF support of long-term revolutionary research will lay 
the foundation for the next generation of technologies to protect the 
homeland. By pushing the boundaries, scientists will often fail; but, 
when  they  make  that  dramatic  and  revolutionary  breakthrough, 
they  will  enable  a  field  of  technology  that  will  make  the  country 
safer and help us defeat terrorists. 

I’m  looking  forward  to  the  comments  of  the  witnesses  this  after-
noon. When the work of America’s scientists and engineers is com-
bined with the courage and commitment of America’s first-respond-
ers,  law  enforcement  personnel,  and  intelligence  officers,  Ameri-
can’s homeland can surely be safer. 

With  that,  I’ll  ask—I  guess  the  Ranking  Member  is  not  here. 

We’ll allow his comments later. I’ll introduce our panelists. 

Appearing  before  the  Subcommittee  this  afternoon  is  Dr.  Hratch 
G.  Semerjian.  Dr.  Semerjian  is  Acting  Director  of  the  National  In-
stitute  of  Standards  and  Technology.  Joining  him  is  Vice  Admiral 
Conrad Lautenbacher. Admiral Lautenbacher is Under Secretary of 
Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere,  and  NOAA  Administrator. 
Finally, Dr. Arden Bement—I ought to be able to pronounce that—
Director  of  National  Science  Foundation,  will  be  addressing  the 
Subcommittee this morning. 

With  that,  we’ll—Senator  McCain,  you  said  you  did  not  want  an 

opening statement. 

Senator MCCAIN. Right. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
OK,  with  that,  we’ll  start  with  Dr.  Semerjian.  Please  provide  a 
short  summary  of  your  testimony.  All  of  your  testimonies  will  be 
submitted completely for the record. 

Thank you, sir. 

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  HRATCH  G.  SEMERJIAN,  ACTING
DIRECTOR,  NATIONAL  INSTITUTE  OF  STANDARDS  AND 
TECHNOLOGY, 
ADMINISTRATION,
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  Thank  you,  Chairman  DeMint  and  Senator 

TECHNOLOGY 

McCain. 

I’m  Hratch  Semerjian,  Acting  Director  of  NIST.  Thank  you  for 
this opportunity to testify as part of this distinguished panel about 
NIST’s homeland security efforts. 

Our history of supporting homeland- and national-security efforts 
began  shortly  after  NIST—National  Bureau  of  Standards  then,  as 
you  pointed  out—was  founded,  in  1901,  and  continues  today  with 
about  100  programs  supported  by  approximately  $60  million  in  di-
rect appropriations, augmented by significant funding support from 
other  agencies,  such  as  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  and 
Department  of  Justice.  Our  research  is  coordinated  with  the  De-
partment of Homeland Security through a Memorandum of Under-
standing that was signed in May of 2003. 

Shortly after September 11, 2001, NIST building and fire experts 
joined  teams  of  scientists  and  engineers  in  assessment  of  how  the 
Pentagon  and  the  World  Trade  Center  buildings  were  severely 
damaged or collapsed in the attacks. NIST experts presented to the 
U.S. Army Corps of Engineers a report of recommendations for re-
building and retrofitting the Pentagon that would improve the Pen-
tagon’s resistance to similar attacks. NIST also provided assistance 
through  the  New  York  Medical  Examiner  in  identifying  victims  of 
the  World  Trade  Center  by  validating  existing  methods  and  devis-
ing  new  DNA  analysis  techniques  to  allow  identifications  that 
would not otherwise have been possible due to small and degraded 
samples. 

Later this month, we’ll conclude our comprehensive technical in-
vestigation  into  how  the  World  Trade  Center  Towers  collapsed  by 
issuing  our  findings  and  recommendations  for  improvements  to 
building and fire codes, standards, and practices. 

After  the  October  2001  bioterrorist  attacks,  NIST  worked  with 
the federal agencies and the private sector to solve the challenging 
problem of ensuring that commercial radiation facilities could effec-
tively  sterilize  U.S.  mail  contaminated  with  anthrax.  When  the 
Hart Senate Office building was contaminated with anthrax, NIST 
experts  in  ventilation  systems  and  indoor  air  quality  modeled  the 
flow patterns in the building and helped the EPA with planning of 
the decontamination efforts. 

Subsequent  to  the  attacks  of  9/11,  NIST  has  supported  the  Na-
tion’s  homeland  security  effort  in  a  number  of  different  research 
areas.  Today,  I’d  like  to  highlight  just  a  few  of  these  for  the  Sub-
committee.  I  have  provided  more  details,  of  course,  in  my  written 
testimony.  I  should  note  that  in  all  of  these  efforts  we  work  very 
closely with our colleagues in other federal agencies. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

As  part  of  its  fulfillment  of  the  Patriot  Act,  NIST  conducted  the 
fingerpoint  vendor  technology  evaluation  in  2003.  This  program 
was  the  first  large-scale  evaluation  of  34  different  fingerprint 
matching systems. The evaluation, which was based on fingerprint 
data from a variety of Federal and State government sources, test-
ed  performance  accuracy  for  various  numbers  and  types  of  finger-
prints,  and  provided  valuable  recommendations  and  input  to  the 
DHS’s US–VISIT program. 

NIST has provided the common technical thread for the develop-
ment  of  several  standards  important  to  DHS  and  the  first-re-
sponder  community.  Our  Office  of  Law  Enforcement  Standards  is 
facilitating  communication’s  interoperability  efforts  through  the 
consensus  standards  process  by  employing  a  structured  approach 
for  confronting  interoperability  standardization  issues.  In  response 
to  Congress’  call  for  immediate  standards  for  communications 
interoperability,  NIST,  along  with  DHS  and  DOJ,  has  developed  a 
partnership with Project 25 Steering Committee made up of public-
safety  leaders  to  either  significantly  accelerate  the  current  P25 
standards  development  or  to  develop  interim  communications 
standards in the absence of P25 standards. 

NIST,  working  with  DHS,  IEEE—that’s  the  Institute  for  Elec-
tronics  and  Electronic  Engineering—and  the  private  sector  orga-
nized  the  necessary  expertise  and  drafting  of  four  new  national 
standards  establishing  baseline  performance  criteria  and  testing 
requirements for radiation detection devices. The specifications will 
ensure  that  ever-more-widely  used  detectors  will  reliably  discern 
above background levels of radiation at ports of entry or other key 
locations. 

Additionally,  NIST  served  as  the  executive  agent  for  the  Inter-
agency  Board  for  Equipment  Standardization  and  Interoperability, 
which  was  created  by  the  Justice  and  Defense  Departments  to  ad-
vise  federal,  state,  and  local  agencies  on  the  selection  and  use  of 
the best available equipment and procedures for first-responders. 

The  IAB  designated  NIST  to  coordinate  the  development  of  a 
suite  of  eight  standards  for  respiratory  equipment,  suits,  gloves, 
and  other  gear  that  protect  first-responders  against  chemical  and 
biological  hazards.  These  standards  were  announced  in  February 
2004. 

NIST is also conducting research on a class of microsensors that 
has  the  potential  to  serve  as  a  cost-effective  early-warning  system 
for  toxic  gases,  and  may  also  be  applicable  to  detection  of  vapors 
from explosive materials. NIST also contributed and participated in 
the  process  to  develop  a  standard  test  method  for  handheld  bio-
assays  for  detection  of  anthrax,  and  is  currently  managing  a  sup-
porting  project  to  develop  sampling  protocols  for  suspicious  pow-
ders. 

Finally, NIST is managing, for the Department of Homeland Se-
curity, an effort to develop a standard for handheld devices for de-
tection  of  chemical  warfare  agents  that  could  be  used  by  first-re-
sponders.  This  standard  is  currently  being  validated  through 
ASTM. 

As  the  Committee  can  see  by  these  examples,  NIST  has  a  very 
diverse portfolio of research activity supporting our Nation’s home-
land  security  efforts.  NIST  is  working  very  closely  with  DHS 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

Science  and  Technology  Directorate  to  coordinate  our  research  ef-
forts  and  to  ensure  effective  implementation.  Our  long  history  of 
research  supporting  homeland  and  national  security  has  been  crit-
ical  for  the  development  of  an  effective  deployment  of  new  tech-
nologies to protect the homeland. 

Once  again,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify,  and  I  will  be 

happy to answer any questions you may have. 

Thank you, Senator. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Semerjian follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  HRATCH G.  SEMERJIAN,  ACTING DIRECTOR,  NATIONAL 
INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY,  TECHNOLOGY ADMINISTRATION,
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Introduction 

Chairman  DeMint  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  Hratch  Semerjian,  Act-
ing  Director  of  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST),  part  of 
the Technology Administration of the Department of Commerce. Thank you for this 
opportunity  to  testify  about  the  contributions  of  NIST  to  homeland  security.  In  ac-
complishing this and all parts of its mission, NIST works in many ways with compa-
nies, universities, and other government agencies to help protect our Nation against 
terrorism. 

Since  World  War  II,  our  Nation’s  greatest  resources  for  homeland  and  national 
security have been a strong economy and a technological edge based on innovation. 
NIST  has  the  unique  mission  of  providing  the  measurements  and  standards  infra-
structure that the private sector, universities, and government agencies need to de-
velop  new  technologies,  products  and  services,  conduct  research,  and  effectively 
carry out their responsibilities. NIST measurements and standards and our support 
of  new  technologies  have  strengthened  our  economy  and  enabled  the  development 
and effective deployment of new homeland security technologies. 

NIST’s  long  and  productive  history  of  supporting  homeland  and  national  security 
efforts began shortly after its founding as the National Bureau of Standards. Partly 
in  response  to  the  Baltimore  fire  of  1904,  Bureau  researchers  worked  on  the  devel-
opment of a national standard for hose couplings as well as a standard for an inter-
changeable  device  for  nonstandard  couplings.  Other  examples  include  crucial  sup-
port  for  the  development  of  nuclear  weapons,  aircraft  instruments,  and  other  tech-
nologies  that  helped  the  U.S.  succeed  in  past  conflicts.  With  its  long  experience  as 
well  as  a  diverse  array  of  expertise,  NIST  was  able  to  quickly  respond  to  the  ter-
rorist attacks of 2001. 

NIST  currently  has  about  100  programs,  supported  by  approximately  $60  million 
in direct appropriations augmented by significant funding support from other agen-
cies. This research is coordinated with the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) 
through  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding  signed  in  2003  between  former  Under 
Secretary  for  Technology,  Phillip  Bond,  and  Under  Secretary  for  Science  and  Tech-
nology  at  DHS,  Charles  McQueary.  In  addition,  other  long  standing  relationships 
with the Department of Justice, the State Department, the National Security Agen-
cy,  and  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  also  ensure  that  NIST’s  research  is 
sufficiently  coordinated.  NIST’s  homeland  security  research  spans  the  following 
areas:

diation 

• Chemical,  biological,  radiological,  nuclear,  explosive  threat  detection  and  reme-
• Safety of buildings and structures 
• Safety and effectiveness of emergency responders 
• Transportation system safety 
• Information security 
• Critical infrastructure protection 
• Biometric identification 
• DNA identification and diagnostics
This  afternoon  I  would  like  to  describe  NIST’s  response  to  9/11,  and  then  share 

just a few examples of other NIST research supporting homeland security. 
NIST Response to 9/11 and the World Trade Center Report 

As I previously stated NIST responses to the terrorist attacks of 2001 were swift. 
Shortly  after  September  11,  2001,  NIST  building  and  fire  experts  joined  teams  of 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

scientists  and  engineers  in  assessment  of  how  the  Pentagon  as  well  as  the  World 
Trade  Center  buildings  were  severely  damaged  or  collapsed  in  the  attacks.  Two 
months later, NIST experts presented to the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers a report 
of recommendations for rebuilding and retrofitting the Pentagon that would improve 
the  Pentagon’s  resistance  to  similar  attacks.  NIST  also  provided  assistance  to  the 
New  York  City  medical  examiner  in  identifying  victims  of  the  World  Trade  Center 
by  validating  existing  methods  and  devising  new  DNA  analysis  techniques  to  allow 
identifications  that  would  not  otherwise  have  been  possible  due  to  small  and  de-
graded  samples.  In  addition,  NIST  contributed  expertise  on  life-cycle  cost  analysis 
and  priority  setting  that  are  key  components  of  the  risk  assessment  guide  issued 
by  the  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency  (FEMA)  to  mitigate  potential  ter-
rorist attacks against buildings. 

After  the  October  2001  bioterrorist  attacks,  NIST  worked  with  federal  agencies 
and the private sector to ensure that commercial radiation facilities could effectively 
sterilize U.S. mail contaminated with anthrax. NIST worked with the Armed Forces 
Radiobiology  Research  Institute  in  Bethesda,  the  U.S.  Postal  Service,  and  other 
agencies to solve this challenging problem. 

When the Hart Senate Office Building in Washington, DC was contaminated with 
anthrax, NIST experts in ventilation systems and indoor air quality modeled the dif-
ferent  ways  air  flow  in  the  building  may  have  disseminated  the  anthrax  spores. 
These  models  helped  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency  plan  the  decontamina-
tion  of  the  building.  Since  then,  similar  models  have  been  used  to  evaluate  protec-
tion  technologies  such  as  air  filters,  air  cleaners,  and  sensor-driven  ventilation  sys-
tems, and one was incorporated into the Immune Building Toolkit developed by the 
Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA). 

The  collapse  of  New  York  City’s  World  Trade  Center  structures  was  among  the 
worst building disasters in recorded history. As part of its larger effort to save lives 
in  future  terrorist  attacks  or  natural  disasters,  NIST  has  been  carrying  out  a  re-
sponse plan with three parts:

• A building and fire safety investigation of the probable causes of the WTC tower 
collapse  after  terrorists  flew  jet-fuel  laden  airliners  into  the  buildings,  and  the 
associated evacuation and emergency response procedures.

• A  research  and  development  program  to  provide  the  technical  basis  for  im-

proved building and fire codes, standards, and practices.

• A dissemination and technical assistance program to engage leaders of the con-
struction  and  building  community  in  implementing  proposed  changes  to  prac-
tices, standards and codes.

The investigation was conducted with $16 million in funding by the U.S. Congress 
from  an  emergency  supplemental  appropriation  and  transferred  to  NIST  from 
FEMA.  It  builds  on  the  findings  and  recommendations  of  an  earlier  WTC  building 
performance  study  conducted  jointly  by  FEMA  and  the  American  Society  of  Civil 
Engineers. 

The investigation’s analysis, which is the most detailed examination of a building 
failure  ever  conducted,  established  the  probable  sequences  for  the  collapse  of  each 
tower:

1.  The  aircraft  impact  severed  perimeter  columns,  damaged  interior  core  col-
umns, and dislodged fireproofing off structural beams.
2.  The  fires,  which  were  initiated  by  jet  fuel  but  fed  by  building  contents  such 
as furniture and paper, weakened the building core.
3. The fires also weakened floors, which sagged and pulled inward on the perim-
eter columns.
4.  The  fire  weakened  perimeter  columns  bowed  inward  and  buckled  due  to  the 
floor pull-in forces, leading to collapse.

Along  with  this  analysis,  NIST  released  in  April  drafts  of  15  reports  from  three 

projects of the investigation:

• Analysis of building and fire codes and practices 
• Occupant behavior, egress and emergency communications 
• Fire service technologies and guidelines
Recommendations  for  improvements  to  building  and  fire  codes,  standards  and 
practices  derived  from  these  and  the  other  five  projects  in  the  investigation  will  be 
released for public comment later this month, along with the draft of the final inves-
tigation report and drafts of 27 reports from the remaining five projects. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

Additional Homeland Security Research 

NIST, with its diverse research portfolio is also supporting the Nation’s homeland 
security  efforts  in  a  number  of  ways  that  are  not  directly  related  to  the  attacks  of 
9/11. 
Cybersecurity 

Cybersecurity work at NIST plays a key role in addressing the urgent need to im-
prove the cybersecurity posture of the Nation, and in particular that of the Federal 
Government.  Some  examples  of  recent  and  continuing  NIST  work  in  this  field  are:
• NIST is developing minimum security controls for all federal computer systems. 
This effort will have a huge impact on the Nation. These minimum security con-
trols  will  be  mandatory  for  federal  agencies,  although  we  expect  they  may  be-
come a de facto standard in the private sector as well.

• NIST  continues  to  publish  a  wide  range  of  cybersecurity  standards  and  guide-
lines,  which  are  available  free  on  NIST’s  Web  site.  These  are  frequently  used 
by  the  private  sector,  state  and  local  governments,  and  even  some  foreign  gov-
ernments. Our contingency planning guideline alone was downloaded more than 
400,000 times during the first year it was available.

• Homeland Security Presidential Directive #12, which mandates a common iden-
tification  standard  for  all  federal  employees  and  contractors,  requires  NIST  to 
develop a series of standards leading to reliable and secure ‘‘smart cards.’’ NIST 
computer  security  specialists  worked  closely  with  other  federal  agencies—in-
cluding  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget,  the  Office  of  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Policy,  and  the  Departments  of  Defense,  State,  Justice,  and  Homeland 
Security—as  well  as  private  industry,  to  develop  Federal  Information  Proc-
essing  Standard  201,  Personal  Identity  Verification  of  Federal  Employees  and 
Contractors.

• NIST is supporting the Small Business Administration in security outreach ac-

tivities to small businesses.

• NIST is developing cryptographic standards for ‘‘constrained environments.’’ An 
example  is  a  ‘‘smart  card’’  with  limited  memory  and  little  or  no  computing 
power.

• NIST is beginning work to develop security checklists for computer systems that 

control buildings and manufacturing processes.

• NIST is developing the National Vulnerability Database, a comprehensive infor-
mation technology database and search engine that integrates all publicly avail-
able U.S. Government vulnerability resources and provides links to industry re-
sources.

• NIST  is  working  to  develop  metrics  for  the  effectiveness  of  software  assurance 
tools,  and  assessing  current  methods  and  tools  in  order  to  identify  deficiencies 
which can lead to software product failures and vulnerabilities.

• NIST continues to develop security guidelines/best practices on risk assessment, 
media destruction and sanitization, desktop IT security scenarios, and malware 
mitigation measures.

Additionally,  NIST’s  Hollings  Manufacturing  Extension  Partnership  is  beginning 
its outreach activities to small and medium sized manufacturers by providing them 
guidance  with  vulnerability  assessments,  business  continuity,  and  supply  chain  im-
plications. 
Biometrics 

As part of its fulfillment of the Patriot Act, NIST conducted the Fingerprint Ven-
dor  Technology  Evaluation  in  2003.  The  18  competing  companies  used  34  different 
fingerprint matching systems. The evaluation, which was based on fingerprint data 
from  a  variety  of  U.S.  and  State  Government  sources,  tested  performance  accuracy 
for various numbers and types of fingerprints. 

The evaluation demonstrated the significance of fingerprint quality as well as the 
number  of  fingers  used.  (The  matching  accuracy  using  four  fingers  was  better  than 
the  accuracy  using  only  two  fingers,  which  in  turn  was  better  than  single-finger 
matching.) The test also showed that the most accurate fingerprint systems perform 
better  than  the  most  accurate  facial  recognition  systems,  even  when  using  only  a 
single fingerprint. 

NIST’s key Patriot Act recommendations included in the report to Congress titled 
‘‘Use of Technology Standards and Interoperable Databases with Machine-Readable, 
Tamper-Resistant Travel Documents’’ dated February 2003:

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

1. For verification (‘‘one-to-one matching’’ to establish that the person is who he/
she claims to be), NIST recommends one face image and two index fingerprints.
2. For identification (‘‘one-to-many matching’’ to find the identity of a person in 
a large database), NIST recommends ten slap fingerprint images for enrollment 
and checking of large databases. Face images are not recommended.

The  Consolidated  Appropriations  Act,  2005,  provided  an  increase  of  $2.0  million 
to NIST’s biometric program. This new funding will allow NIST to begin testing the 
accuracy of multimodal systems, develop guidelines for testing fingerprint segmenta-
tion  methods,  and  determining  the  influence  of  multiple  images  on  the  accuracy  of 
facial biometrics. 
Radiation detectors 

NIST, in cooperation with the American National Standards Institute (ANSI), has 
an  extensive  program  to  develop  and  support  standards  for  the  radiation  detectors 
used  by  first  responders  and  for  other  homeland  security  applications.  The  stand-
ards will help first responders and government agencies make better use of existing 
equipment  and  acquire  the  right  equipment  for  emergency  response,  and  they  will 
encourage manufacturers to better design instruments and represent their specifica-
tions to agency and responder buyers. 

This program includes:
• Leadership  in  the  development  of  the  four  ANSI  standards  that  are  currently 
released.  These  standards  cover  electronic  personal  alarming  detectors  (called 
‘‘pagers’’),  personal  radiation  dosimeters,  portable  instruments,  radionuclide 
identifiers  (specialized  devices  that  can  identify  specific  radioactive  materials), 
and portal monitors.
• Ongoing  development  of  newer  standards,  such  as  for  portal  monitors  with 
• Leadership in the development of test and evaluation protocols for determining 
whether  such  radiation  detectors  meet  the  technical  requirements  of  the  new 
ANSI standards.

radionuclide identification.

As  an  example  of  the  application  of  the  new  standards,  NIST  recently  tested  31 
commercial  detectors,  including  hand-held  survey  meters,  pagers,  and  radionuclide 
identifiers.  Federal,  state,  and  local  agencies  are  using  such  instruments  as  part  of 
homeland  security-related  efforts  to  detect  and  identify  radioactive  materials.  The 
tests  determined  that  portable  radiation  detectors  generally  perform  well  against 
the  new  consensus  standards  but  provided  inaccurate  readings  for  certain  types  of 
radiation. Researchers compared the device readings to NIST measurements for dif-
ferent  radiations  levels.  The  majority  of  the  detectors  agreed  with  NIST-measured 
values but some detectors tested had a large discrepancy in readings for the lowest-
energy X-rays, and were much larger than those stated in manufacturers’ specifica-
tions. 

Other examples of NIST work related on radiation detectors include the following:
• Technical guidance for emergency responders.
• Development  of  a  test  bed  for  evaluating  hand-held  radiological  detectors  and 
• Development of NIST-traceable test sources for gamma rays and neutrons used 
• Development  of  methods,  testing  materials,  standard  reference  materials,  and 

in calibrations of detectors.

truck portal monitors.

measurement validations for radiological clean-up and mitigation.

Public Safety Communications Interoperability 

NIST’s  Office  of  Law  Enforcement  Standards  (OLES)  is  the  common  technical 
thread  that  is  working  to  facilitate  local,  state,  and  federal  communications  inter-
operability  efforts  through  the  consensus  standards  process.  Funded  through 
SAFECOM,  a  program  of  DHS’s  Science  and  Technology  Directorate’s  Office  for 
Interoperability  and  Compatability,  the  Department  of  Justice’s  Community  Ori-
ented Policing Service, and the Advanced Generation of Interoperability for Law En-
forcement  (AGILE)  program,  OLES  has  been  employing  a  structured  approach  for 
confronting interoperability standardization issues. This standardization strategy is 
centered  on  the  development  of  an  architectural  framework  that  satisfies  the  real-
world  requirements  of  public  safety  responders.  The  framework  defines  the  overall 
structured  approach  for  facilitating  interoperability.  Functional  Standards  (in  the 
form  of  Interface  Specifications)  then  define  the  details  of  the  structure,  and  indi-
cate  how  the  architecture  (and  its  components)  will  operate.  Although  progress  has 
been  slow  in  the  development  of  these  standards,  significant  progress  has  been 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

achieved within the last year. OLES helped to complete the Public Safety Statement 
of  Requirements  for  Wireless  Communications  and  Interoperability  on  behalf  of 
SAFECOM  in  March  2004.  This  is  the  first  comprehensive,  practitioner-accepted, 
record  of  the  telecommunication  needs  of  the  public  safety  community  within  and 
across local, state, federal, and tribal boundaries. 

Additionally, OLES on behalf of DHS SAFECOM, produced a draft of an architec-
tural  framework  which  is  in  essence  a  map  that  shows  a  network  of  networks  and 
a system of systems approach which will be employed by public safety in the future. 
In response to Congress’ call for immediate standards for communications interoper-
ability,  NIST,  along  with  DHS  and  DOJ,  have  developed  a  partnership  with  public 
safety leadership to either significantly accelerate the current P25 standards devel-
opment  or  develop  interim  communications  standards  in  the  absence  of  P25  stand-
ards. Additionally, Congress requested that SAFECOM produce a report on the plan 
for accelerating the development of national voluntary consensus standards for pub-
lic safety interoperable communications. It is expected that because of the recent ef-
forts  by  NIST  and  its  partners,  key  interoperability  standards  will  be  published  by 
the end of 2005, and products employing these standards would be available by the 
end of 2006. 
Operations in Collapsed Buildings 

In  2001,  search-and-rescue  robots  that  had  been  tested  on  a  special  NIST  course 
penetrated areas too small and too hazardous for emergency responders to locate re-
mains of several victims at the World Trade Center site. At that time, NIST already 
had  expertise  with  collapsed  buildings,  including  setting  up  competitions  designed 
to  accelerate  the  development  and  testing  of  urban  search-and-rescue  robots.  Last 
year, NIST organized competitions in New Orleans, San Jose, and Lisbon, Portugal. 
More  broadly,  NIST  has  launched  a  DHS-funded  multi-year  program  to  develop 
comprehensive  standards  and  performance  metrics  for  urban  search-and-rescue  ro-
bots. 

Collapsed  buildings  also  present  a  significant  problem  in  terms  of  radio  commu-
nications.  First  responders  who  rely  on  radio  communications  often  lose  signals  in 
shielded or complex environments such as in steel and reinforced concrete high-rise 
structures,  and  in  the  basements  or  elevator  shafts  of  buildings.  It  also  is  very  dif-
ficult  to  detect  radio  signals  through  the  dense  rubble  of  a  building  that  has  col-
lapsed as a result of natural disasters or terrorist attacks. To simulate disaster envi-
ronments,  NIST  is  using  real-world  ‘‘laboratories’’—buildings  that  are  scheduled  to 
be  imploded  as  part  of  construction  and  recycling  projects—such  as  the  old  Wash-
ington  Convention  Center  and  Veterans  Stadium  in  Philadelphia.  After  the  implo-
sion,  NIST  researchers  studied  various  schemes  for  detecting  signals  by  searching 
with directional antennas and by connecting detectors to metal debris found within 
the rubble of the building. A technical report on these experiments will be published 
this summer. 
Forensic Analysis of Magnetic Audio Tapes 

NIST recently developed a real-time magnetic imaging system that enables crime 
investigators  to  ‘‘see’’  signs  of  tampering  in  audio  tapes,  such  as  erasing  and  over-
dubbing. The new system, which permits faster screening and more accurate audio-
tape analysis than previously possible, was recently delivered to the Federal Bureau 
of  Investigation  (FBI)  Forensic  Audio  Analysis,  which  receives  hundreds  of  audio-
tapes  annually  for  analysis.  Representing  evidence  from  crimes  such  as  terrorism, 
homicide  and  fraud,  these  tapes  come  from  a  wide  variety  of  devices,  including  an-
swering  machines,  cassette  recorders  and  digital  audiotape  recorders.  The  benefits 
of  the  NIST  system  are  its  speed  in  correlating  sounds  with  magnetic  marks  on 
tape, and the fact that it makes an image without damaging the tape. 
Detection of Explosives and Toxic Chemicals 

The  cost  and  size  of  devices  for  detecting  toxic  airborne  chemicals  largely  limits 
them  to  specialized  equipment  designed  for  use  by  the  military  or  by  first  respond-
ers  to  chemical  spills.  In  the  event  of  an  attack  involving  toxic  chemical  agents—
such  as  the  sarin  gas  attack  in  a  Tokyo  subway  station—such  portable  detectors 
typically would not arrive on the scene until after victims had been harmed. 

NIST  is  conducting  research  on  a  class  of  microsensors  that  has  the  potential  to 
serve as a cost-effective early warning system for toxic gases and may also be appli-
cable  to  the  detection  of  vapors  from  explosive  materials.  The  NIST  devices  use  an 
array of microscopic hotplates coated with a film that is sensitive to ambient chemi-
cals.  A  key  advantage  of  this  technology  is  that  various  types  of  films  can  be  com-
bined  with  multiple  types  of  temperature  cycles.  An  array  of  hotplates  can  thus 
produce  a  ‘‘signature’’  that  can  be  matched  against  a  library  of  chemical  signatures 
to  identify  both  the  type  and  concentration  of  the  toxic  gas.  Another  advantage  is 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

that  the  microsensors  can  be  produced  inexpensively  with  electronic  processing  cir-
cuits  built  in.  Preliminary  testing  at  the  Army’s  Edgewood  Arsenal  has  confirmed 
that  1-part-per-million  sensitivity  is  feasible  with  actual  chemical  warfare  agents. 
Standards Development Organizations 

Besides  the  research  done  in  our  laboratories,  NIST  works  with  private  sector 
Standards  Development  Organizations  (SDO’s)  on  the  implementation  of  homeland 
security standards.

• NIST assisted the DHS Science and Technology Directorate, Standards Portfolio 
in  developing  and  implementing  a  formal  procedure  for  the  adoption  of  stand-
ards.

• NIST  is  assisting  DHS  in  the  coordination  of  public  and  private  resources  for 
the  development  of  technical  standards  that  support  homeland  security.  The 
primary  focus  of  this  coordination  is  the  American  National  Standards  Insti-
tute’s  Homeland  Security  Standards  Panel,  which  is  co-chaired  by  Mary  Saun-
ders of the NIST Standards Services Division.

• NIST  recently  leveraged  its  technical  expertise  in  ion  mobility  spectrometry 
(IMS)  to  establish  minimum  performance  requirements  and  an  associated  test 
method  for  detectors  of  trace  explosives  based  on  IMS.  Although  some  first  re-
sponders  already  use  IMS  trace  detection  equipment,  a  documentary  standard 
was  needed  to  address  the  wide  variety  of  possible  future  uses.  The  standard 
was developed with input from six detector manufacturers, state and local gov-
ernment  agencies,  federal  agencies  such  as  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  the  Bureau 
of  Alcohol,  Tobacco,  Firearms  and  Explosives  and  the  Transportation  Security 
Administration, and security professionals such as the U.S. Secret Service.

Conclusion 

As the Committee can see by the few examples I have cited, NIST has a very di-
verse  portfolio  of  research  activities  supporting  our  Nation’s  homeland  security  ef-
fort.  After  the  terrorist  attacks  of  9/11,  NIST  responded  to  the  research  challenges 
it faced. NIST’s long history of research supporting homeland and national security 
is  helping  to  enable  the  development  and  effective  deployment  of  new  technologies 
to  protect  the  homeland.  Once  again  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  about 
NIST’s activities and I would be happy to answer any questions you may have.

Senator  DEMINT.  We’ll  save  our  questions  until  we  finish  the 

panel. 

Admiral. 

FOR 

AND 

OCEANS 

STATEMENT  OF  VICE  ADMIRAL  CONRAD  C.  LAUTENBACHER, 
(RETIRED),  UNDER  SECRETARY  OF
ATMOSPHERE;

JR.,  U.S.  NAVY 
COMMERCE 
ADMINISTRATOR, NOAA 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator 
Nelson,  and  staff  members.  It’s  a  great  pleasure  and  privilege  to 
be  able  to  testify  today  before  you  about  NOAA’s  contributions  to 
the national homeland security mission. 

NOAA  is  a  science-based  agency,  but  provides  service  to  our 
country  24-by-7.  That  24-by-7  information  underpins  30  percent  of 
our  GDP,  so  it’s  extremely  important  to  our  economic  security,  as 
well as our physical security. We work hard to ensure that we meet 
those demands that the economy and society places on us. 

We have a list of capabilities, of over 50, that are vital to the se-
curity of this Nation. With the time limits that I have, I will men-
tion  a  few,  and  there  are  others  that  are  listed  in  our—in  my  for-
mal testimony, for the record. 

In  addition,  because  of  the  importance  of  this  information  to  the 
economy,  we  work  very  hard  at  our  internal  security.  We  need  to 
ensure that the information provided for the—running the economy 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

is  available  24-by-7,  and  we  have  spent  the  last  several  years  en-
suring the continuity of that data to all segments of society. 

The  first  topic  I’d  like  to  mention  is  alerts  and  public  warnings. 
The  National  Weather  Service  branch  of  NOAA  has  something 
called  the  NOAA  Weather  Radio.  That  is  the  only  system  in  our 
Nation  that  goes  directly  into  every  home,  every  school,  every  fire 
station,  and  all  of  the  press.  It  provides  those  alerts  and  warnings 
that  you  see  across  your  television  that  tells  you  you’re  going  to 
have a severe thunderstorm or there’s going to be lightning or hail 
or a tornado or a hurricane, flooding. That system is alarmed, and 
is—now covers 98 percent of our country. 

We  have  signed,  this  last  year,  a  memorandum  of  agreement 
with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  to  make  that  part  of 
the national warning system, so that, as of today, all types of haz-
ards  that  can  affect  our  communities  are  inserted  into  NOAA 
Weather  Radio.  So,  if  you  have  a  NOAA  Weather  Radio,  you’ll  be 
warned  of  chemical  spills,  of  any  biohazards,  of  significant  local 
events.  It  goes  into  all  of  our  weather  forecast  offices.  And  any 
event,  whether  it’s  natural  or  manmade  or  of  a  terrorist  nature, 
will  be  available  for  alerting  the  public  on  NOAA  Weather  Radio, 
All Hazards. 

We  also  have  an  agreement  with  the  Department  of  Education 
and DHS to provide the NOAA Weather Radio to public schools in 
selected  areas.  We’re  looking  to  make  sure  that  eventually  all 
schools  in  the  United  States  have  these  radios  available  for  build-
ing emergency plans. 

Let me move on to forecasts and dispersion modeling. One of the 
more  interesting  issues  that  we  have  for  natural  disasters,  as  well 
as  manmade  disasters,  is  what  happens  when  chemicals  or  dan-
gerous substances get into the atmosphere. What types of forecasts 
do  we  need  to  ensure  the  safety  and  security  of  our  Nation?  We 
have  built  numerical  models  of  the  atmosphere,  which  is  what 
we’re  strong  into,  as  our  charge  is  for  weather  information.  It’s 
used  for  flight  planning,  ship  routing,  energy  distribution,  as  well 
as many other activities. Our air-dispersion models help emergency 
planners detect and track chemical, biological, and radiological haz-
ards, as well. 

First-responders can use laptop applications that we’ve developed 
to be able to tell where a plume, a hazardous plume, will be going, 
and track it, and use it to be able to develop evacuations and miti-
gation  procedures  for  our  towns  and  cities  across  the  Nation.  We 
are  now  conducting  a  pilot  program  to  integrate  realtime  weather 
models  with  hazardous-plume  predictions,  so  it  can  be  simulta-
neously provided to all forecast offices and all emergency managers 
across the country. 

We  have  a  special  operation  going  in  here,  in  Washington.  We 
call  it  DCNet.  It  is  a  system  for  taking  data  in  the  urban  canyons 
of  our  major  city  here,  of  Washington,  and  building  models  that 
will  allow  us  to  provide  the  micro-level  information  for  accurate 
evacuation and homeland security in Washington. During the 2005 
Presidential  inauguration,  NOAA  and  DHS  closely  monitored  this 
information, and it was instantaneously available for anything that 
might need to be covered during the inauguration procedures. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

We  have  conducted  major  atmospheric  dispersion  field  studies 
with  other  federal  agencies  in  a  number  of  cities  across  the  coun-
try.  We  also  are  doing  the  same  kinds  of  modeling  for  fluid  me-
chanical models in the ocean and our coasts, which are very impor-
tant in harbor areas and for safety of seafood and our water-quality 
issues for bathers. 

Let  me  move  on  to  remote  sensing.  We  have  started  to  evaluate 
a Predator B aircraft to look at ways to obtain continuous data for 
oceanic  and  atmospheric  research,  for  nautical  charting,  to  tell 
what’s  going  on,  as  well  as  fisheries  assessment  and  enforcement. 
This is dual-use technology that’s of value both to security, as well 
as to environmental monitoring. We believe that the same systems 
that we can use for national security are valuable, as well, for envi-
ronmental monitoring, and we are working together with DHS and 
the services to further explore the value of remote sensing devices. 
The  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  and  something  called 
Maritime Domain Awareness. We have a program to develop an In-
tegrated  Ocean  Observing  System.  We  believe,  as  we  did  with 
the—I  mentioned  the  Predator—use  of  the  Predator—that  this  is 
a  system  of  dual  usage  again.  It  includes  buoys  in  the  water,  un-
derwater  listening  devices,  as  well  as  satellite  passes,  aviation 
monitoring  of  the  atmosphere  around  our  coasts.  That  system  can 
pick up a great deal of information for what people in Maritime Do-
main  Awareness  call  a  ‘‘common  operating  picture’’  of  under-
standing what’s going on in our coasts. 

We  also  have  built  into  our  capability  for  surveying  our  harbors 
and  our  coasts.  Remember,  NOAA  is  the  agency  that  produces  all 
the charts for bringing the ships—our $1 trillion maritime industry 
depends on that information. NOAA performed the baseline assess-
ments  after  9/11  to  ensure  that—for  our—half  of  the  country—
Navy  did  half,  Coast  Guard  did  part,  and  we  did  half—to  ensure 
there  were  no  mines  or  other  types  of  potential  hazards  in  the 
water  to  our  ports.  We  are  now  building  a  way  to  do  that  much 
more rapidly and safely by the use of autonomous underwater vehi-
cles  and  autonomous  surface  vehicles  to  enhance  the  speed  of  sur-
vey  and  ensuring  that  we  understand  exactly  what’s  in  our  port, 
in our channels, in our harbors as our ships come and go. 

We  have  implemented  something  called  a  National  Vessel  Moni-
toring System that goes with—it’s in concert with an ocean observ-
ing system. This was designed to keep track of fishing vessels, the 
fishing  fleet,  the  civilian  fishing  fleet  that’s  out  there,  but  it  is,  in 
fact,  a  way  to  track  all  sorts  of  things  that  are  going  on.  The  sys-
tem, itself, uses satellite communications. A global positioning sys-
tem reports back to a central command center. And it allows us to 
keep  track  of  where  fishing  vessels  are,  or  are  not,  and  what 
they’re doing, so that we can maintain integrity of our fishing rules 
and  regulations.  It’s  also  a  system  that  allows  us  to  tell  what’s 
going on in any case in those waters, because our fishing fleet goes 
from the coast of Maine to the Bering Sea in Alaska, and provides 
realtime data for the Coast Guard to work on for enforcement. 

We’ve also installed radio transmitters on buoys that we have in 
the near coast that directly connects the Coast Guard to their auto-
matic information system, so that these buoys act as transponders, 
so that the Coast Guard can gain a picture, operating picture, fur-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

ther  out  into  the  EEZ  and  maintain  our  security  defenses  farther 
away from our coasts. 

And one last point is response. We have a wide range of response 
capabilities.  And,  for  instance,  after  the  hurricanes  that  we  had 
last  season,  we  deployed  something  we  call  Navigation  Response 
Teams.  These  are  quick-reaction  teams  that  can  go  out  and  open 
ports  and  harbors  from  changes  that  might  have  occurred,  or  at 
least  survey  and  provide  the  proper  information  to  our  ships  and 
maritime industry that uses the coasts. We can do this quickly. We 
helped  reopen  the  Gulf  Coast  ports  and  their  East  Coast  ports 
within several days after the hurricanes passed, this last year. 

With that, I wish to conclude my testimony and, again, thank the 
Committee  for  their  support  of  NOAA  and  our  programs.  And  I 
stand by to answer your questions. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Admiral Lautenbacher follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD LAUTENBACHER,  JR.,  U.S.  NAVY 
(RETIRED),  UNDER SECRETARY OF COMMERCE FOR OCEANS AND ATMOSPHERE;
ADMINISTRATOR, NOAA 
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  Conrad  Lautenbacher,  Ad-
ministrator of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) of the 
Department of Commerce. Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today 
to  discuss  NOAA’s  contributions  to  the  national  homeland  security  mission.  I  am 
proud  to  lead  a  team  of  men  and  women  whose  daily  activities  advance  our  home-
land  security  and  strongly  believe  NOAA’s  contribution  is  of  tremendous  benefit  to 
the United States. 

Although  NOAA  is  best  known  as  a  premier  science  and  service  agency  whose 
mission  is  to  describe  and  predict  changes  in  the  Earth’s  environment,  NOAA’s  ex-
pertise and services can be applied to many other areas, including national security. 
NOAA’s  responsibilities  for  the  environment,  safety,  and  commerce  of  this  Nation 
span  the  oceans,  coasts,  and  atmosphere.  The  capabilities  that  are  part  of  NOAA’s 
standard daily operations often are vital during times of emergency. 

NOAA has established a Homeland Security Program Office to serve as the prin-
ciple  point  of  contact  for  NOAA  regarding  homeland  security  programs  across  the 
entire  Agency.  This  office  coordinates  homeland  security  programs,  ensures  con-
tinuity  of  operations,  and  prepares  for  continued  delivery  of  services  during  emer-
gencies. 
NOAA Homeland Security Products and Services 

After  reviewing  the  full  range  of  its  capabilities,  NOAA  has  identified  more  than 
50  capabilities  that  could  immediately  advance  the  Nation’s  homeland  security  ef-
forts.  NOAA  leverages  these  already  existing  programs,  technologies,  and  expertise 
in  new  and  innovative  ways  to  assist  the  U.S.  Department  of  Homeland  Security 
(DHS)  and  has  actively  partnered  with  many  other  agencies  (state,  local  and  fed-
eral)  to  address  homeland  security  issues.  I  will  review  a  few  of  our  contributions. 
Alerts and Public Warnings 

The National Weather Service broadcasts warnings, watches, forecasts, and other 
hazard  information  regarding  tornados,  flash  floods,  and  other  potential  life-threat-
ening  situations  24  hours  a  day,  7  days  a  week,  via  a  nationwide  network  of  radio 
stations.  NOAA  coordinates  these  warnings  and  advisories  with  the  Federal  Emer-
gency  Management  Agency.  Working  with  the  Federal  Communications  Commis-
sion’s  Emergency  Alert  System,  the  NOAA  Weather  Radio  was  expanded  to  serve 
as an ‘‘all hazards’’ radio network. In June 2004 this system’s capabilities were fur-
ther expanded to allow DHS to send critical all-hazards alerts and warnings directly 
through the NOAA All-Hazards Network. The NOAA All-Hazards Network consists 
of  over  950  radio  transmitters  located  throughout  the  United  States  and  U.S.  pos-
sessions  and  territories,  allowing  the  transmission  of  weather  watches,  warnings, 
and  advisories  as  well  as  non-meteorological  civil  emergency  messages  to  over  97 
percent of the population. NOAA Weather Radio/All-Hazards now provides alerts for 
both natural (severe storms, hurricanes, tornadoes, earthquakes, and volcanic activ-
ity) and environmental (chemical spills and bio-hazardous releases) events. The all-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

hazards  capability  is  being  implemented  through  agreements  with  local,  state,  and 
federal  emergency  managers  and  first  responders.  NOAA  is  presently  developing  a 
capability  to  reduce  the  time  it  takes  for  an  emergency  manager  to  input  a  hazard 
warning  into  NOAA  Weather  Radio/All-Hazards.  This  will  reduce  the  input  time 
from  7  minutes  to  less  than  2  minutes.  This  capability  will  allow  emergency  man-
agers  direct  access  to  the  Emergency  Alert  System  via  NOAA  Weather  Radio/All-
Hazards, and is expected to be fully operational in Fiscal Year 2006. 

To  complement  this  new  homeland  security  messaging  capability,  we  will  work 
with  DHS  and  the  U.S.  Department  of  Education  to  provide  NOAA  Weather/All-
Hazard Radios to public schools in select top urban areas and two rural states dur-
ing National Preparedness Month in September 2005. 

In  addition  to  the  traditional  weather  radio  that  many  are  familiar  with,  NOAA 
Weather  Radio/All-Hazards  receivers  can  be  integrated  into  devices  to  turn  on 
alarms,  lights,  bed  shakers,  and  other  equipment  especially  useful  for  the  hearing 
impaired  community  and  those  with  special  needs.  RCA/Thomson  has  developed  a 
new line of televisions, called AlertGuard, which integrate a NOAA Weather Radio/
All-Hazards receiver into television sets. 

DHS  is  leading  the  effort  to  develop  a  government-wide  plan  for  the  Integrated 
Public  Alert  and  Warning  System  (IPAWS).  Public  warnings  save  lives  by  inform-
ing, reducing fear, and assisting emergency managers. There are many warning sys-
tems  in  place  across  the  country,  and  while  each  of  these  systems  can  reach  the 
public  directly,  no  one  system  reaches  everyone.  NOAA  information  dissemination 
systems, including NOAA Weather/All-Hazards Radio, as well as information posted 
directly on the Internet and supplied to radio and television stations, will be a part 
of a larger integrated national emergency warning system. 

In  response  to  the  2004  Indian  Ocean  Tsunami,  NOAA  is  committed  to  expand 
the  U.S.  Tsunami  Warning  Program  to  protect  U.S.  lives  and  property  along  all 
coasts  (Pacific,  Atlantic,  Gulf  of  Mexico,  and  Caribbean).  In  order  to  continue  the 
Administration’s  commitment  to  strengthen  the  Tsunami  Warning  Program  and 
mitigate  potential  impacts  from  a  similar  tsunami  event  in  the  U.S.,  NOAA  will 
build on its existing foundation of sensors. NOAA will accomplish this by deploying 
39 additional Deep-ocean Assessment and Reporting of Tsunamis (DART) buoy sys-
tems  strategically  sited  in  the  Pacific,  Atlantic,  and  Caribbean  basins.  Data  from 
DART  buoys  will  aid  U.S.  tsunami  forecasters  in  providing  detailed  tsunami  fore-
casts. The enhanced program will also aid tsunami hazard mitigation actions includ-
ing  inundation  flood  mapping,  evacuation  mapping,  and  community-based  public 
education,  awareness,  and  preparedness.  NOAA  will  operate  and  maintain  the  ex-
panded  DART  system,  new  sea-level  monitoring  stations,  and  the  upgraded  local 
seismic  networks  from  the  24/7  West  Coast/Alaska  Tsunami  Warning  and  Pacific 
Tsunami Warning Centers. 
Forecasts and Dispersion Modeling 

NOAA forecasts include the creation of numerical models of the atmosphere used 
for flight planning, ship routing, and energy distribution. These numerical forecasts 
are  used  to  model  the  dispersion  of  airborne  hazardous  materials  such  as  volcanic 
ash, industrial chemical releases, and radiological accidents. 

NOAA’s  operational  air  dispersion  models  help  emergency  planners  detect  and 
track  chemical,  biological,  and  radiological  hazards  in  the  atmosphere.  When  an 
event  occurs,  first  responders  can  use  laptop  applications  for  hazardous  material 
(hazmat)  modeling  of  industrial  chemicals  on  scene  and  NOAA  regional  models  ac-
cessible through the local Weather Forecast Office. 

One of NOAA’s major contributions in emergency preparation and response is the 
software  program  CAMEO  (Computer-Aided  Management  of  Emergency  Oper-
ations). Jointly designed with the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), CAMEO 
is  widely  used  by  firefighters  and  serves  as  a  primary  tool  in  preparing  for  and  re-
sponding  to  chemical  incidents.  An  updated  version  of  CAMEO  was  released  in 
March 2004. It contains a chemical database of over 6,000 hazardous chemicals with 
chemical-specific  information  on  fire  and  explosive  hazards,  health  hazards,  fire-
fighting  techniques,  cleanup  procedures,  and  protective  clothing.  NOAA  and  EPA 
are expanding the CAMEO chemical database to include information on weapons of 
mass  destruction.  The  ALOHA  (Areal  Locations  of  Hazardous  Atmospheres)  atmos-
pheric  dispersion  model  is  a  computer  program  used  in  conjunction  with  the 
CAMEO  to  predict  how  a  hazardous  gas  cloud  might  disperse  in  the  atmosphere 
after  a  chemical  release  based  on  the  physical  characteristics  of  the  released  chem-
ical  and  atmospheric  conditions.  The  program  can  display  the  location  of  facilities 
storing  hazardous  materials  as  well  as  buildings  of  high  concern,  such  as  hospitals 
and schools. ALOHA is being expanded to predict the impact of fires and explosions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

NOAA’s  Air  Resources  Laboratory  and  Hazmat  program  are  in  the  early  stages 
of developing a Chemical Threat Analysis Planner to improve our ability to evaluate 
potential  threats  from  hazardous  material  releases  using  the  HYSPLIT  dispersion 
model  in  conjunction  with  the  CAMEO  database.  Additional  future  developments 
will  fully  integrate  CAMEO/ALOHA  with  national-level  emergency  information 
management  systems  including  the  Interagency  Modeling  and  Atmospheric  Assess-
ment Center (IMAAC). 

Under the National Response Plan, the IMAAC is the single source of federal haz-
ards  prediction  information  during  the  response  and  recovery  phase  of  Incidents  of 
National  Significance  for  atmospheric  transport  and  dispersion  of  hazardous  re-
leases.  NOAA  is  working  with  DHS  to  develop  procedures  to  organize  and  coordi-
nate  federal  emergency  response  through  this  Center,  providing  decision-makers 
with  custom  products  and  a  single  point  of  contact  for  all-hazards  dispersion  mod-
eling  predictions  and  assessments.  NOAA  and  DHS  are  working  to  integrate 
CAMEO/ALOHA and HYSPLIT into the suite of IMAAC. 

NOAA  is  conducting  a  pilot  program  to  integrate  real-time  weather  models  and 
hazardous  plume  predictions  to  provide  DHS  with  the  ability  to  identify  specific 
areas  to  issue  targeted  homeland  security  alerts  and  warnings  using  reverse  911 
technologies.  In  this  pilot  program,  called  Geo-Targeted  Alerting  System  (GTAS), 
forecasters  at  the  NOAA  Weather  Forecast  Office  located  in  Sterling,  Virginia  will 
provide DHS with toxic plume dispersion information. Given the dispersion forecast 
of a toxic cloud, DHS officials will be able to select several ‘‘targeted’’ warning areas 
to  provide  specific  public  safety  information  for  each  area  using  applications  devel-
oped by NOAA’s Forecast Systems Laboratory. 

Monitoring stations have been installed in Washington, DC, to support one of the 
first dispersion forecasting systems specifically designed for urban areas. These sta-
tions,  known  as  DCNet,  collect  and  analyze  standard  meteorological  data  (as  well 
as  wind  speed,  direction,  and  turbulence  data)  at  frequent  intervals  to  help  define 
downwind  areas  of  potential  high  risk.  In  doing  so,  DCNet  allows  users  to  gain  a 
better  understanding  of  how  hazardous  trace  gases  and  particles  are  dispersed  in 
urban  areas.  During  the  2005  Presidential  Inauguration,  NOAA  and  DHS  closely 
monitored  this  information,  which  was  then  immediately  available  for  dispersion 
model runs in the event of an incident. 

NOAA  has  provided  much  of  the  Nation’s  atmospheric  tracer  expertise  since  the 
1950s.  The  center  of  excellence  resides  within  the  Air  Resources  Laboratory  (ARL) 
at  Idaho  Falls,  Idaho  where  the  ARL  Field  Research  Division  is  located.  In  recent 
years,  the  ARL  team  has  conducted  field  studies  in  Salt  Lake  City  and  Oklahoma 
City, to support the major atmospheric dispersion field studies conducted under the 
sponsorship  of  a  number  of  agencies,  led  by  DOE,  DHS,  and  DoD.  In  the  last  two 
years, studies have been conducted in New York City and in Washington, DC Build-
ing upon them, the ARL team is about to engage in a new round of fieldwork, again 
focusing on New York City and Washington, DC The DC work will be concentrating 
on  the  Pentagon  and  its  surroundings  (sponsored  by  DoD),  the  New  York  project 
will focus on midtown Manhattan (sponsored by DHS). 

The  New  York  City  study  also  involves  two  other  ARL  groups,  located  at  Oak 
Ridge,  Tennessee,  and  Research  Triangle  Park,  North  Carolina.  The  Oak  Ridge 
group  is  leading  the  design  of  a  surface  meteorological  network  to  help  guide  the 
development  of  local  dispersion  forecasting  (an  extension  of  the  DCNet  experience 
in  Washington  DC),  sponsored  by  DHS.  The  Research  Triangle  Park  group  is  con-
ducting  Comprehensive  Fluid  Modeling  studies  and  wind  tunnel  physical  modeling 
investigations, both sponsored by EPA. 
Remote Sensing 

NOAA continues to use Light Detection and Ranging or Lidar, a technique similar 
to Radar, using lasers for mapping terrain elevation features and high quality aerial 
photography  to  collect  data  in  support  of  homeland  security  surveys.  Specifically, 
these  technologies  can  be  used  to  protect  critical  infrastructure,  aid  in  disaster  re-
sponse and recovery efforts, verify dispersion modeling and provide support for spe-
cial security events. 

Currently  NOAA  is  evaluating  a  remotely  operated  aircraft  (ROA)  for  future 
science  and  operational  requirements  within  the  Agency  related  to  oceanic  and  at-
mospheric  research,  climate  research,  marine  sanctuary  mapping  and  enforcement, 
nautical  charting,  and  fisheries  assessment  and  enforcement.  The  platform  NOAA 
is  using  is  a  variant  of  the  General  Atomics  Aeronautical  System’s  Predator  B,  a 
high-altitude,  long-endurance  ROA  that  has  successfully  supported  Operation  Iraqi 
Freedom.  NOAA  worked  with  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  (USCG)  to  ensure  the  common 
operating  areas  and  requirements  both  agencies  shared  were  incorporated  into  the 
ongoing planning and operational flights. This interaction has resulted in both agen-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

cies leveraging their expertise and resources to carefully evaluate the potential ben-
efits ROAs may provide for both agencies’ operational requirements. 

NOAA  demonstrated  the  support  ROAs  could  provide  through  streaming  video 
from a ROA operating off the coast of California and provided to the Homeland Se-
curity  Operations  Center  (HSOC)  in  Washington,  DC  While  only  an  initial  dem-
onstration,  NOAA  fed  live  video  imagery  over  a  satellite  Internet  connection  to 
NOAA’s  Boulder,  Colorado  facility  and  then  directly  to  the  HSOC,  showing  the  po-
tential  these  platforms  can  provide  for  both  incident  and  situational  management. 
Integrated Ocean Observing System and Maritime Domain Awareness 

NOAA has assisted the U.S. Coast Guard and the U.S. Navy in implementing the 
Maritime Domain Awareness (MDA) Program, to develop a national strategy to en-
sure  interagency  coordination  of  homeland  security  policy  and  requirements  in  ma-
rine areas. MDA includes anything associated with the global and coastal maritime 
environment  that  could  adversely  impact  the  security,  safety,  economy,  or  environ-
ment  of  the  United  States.  This  knowledge  is  used  both  operationally  in  the  plan-
ning  and  execution  of  homeland  security  missions,  and  by  researchers  supporting 
the development of new homeland security capabilities. 

To  meet  a  wide  range  of  societal  needs,  our  country  has  embarked  on  a  program 
to  develop  an  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS).  IOOS  is  the  integration 
of existing and planned observing systems to meet common research and operational 
agency needs in the following areas:

• Detecting and forecasting oceanic components of climate variability 
• Facilitating safe and efficient marine operations 
• Ensuring national and homeland security 
• Managing resources for sustainable use 
• Preserving and restoring healthy marine ecosystems 
• Mitigating natural hazards 
• Ensuring public health
The  backbone  network  of  coastal  observations  can  be  of  dual  use  in  supporting 
both  civil  and  homeland  security  objectives.  IOOS  will  enhance  national  and  home-
land  security  in  our  coastal  waters  and  ports  through  improving  Maritime  Domain 
Awareness and through improved observations and predictions of the ocean environ-
ments in which homeland security operations take place. 

On September 24, 2004, Admiral James Loy, Deputy Secretary of the Department 
of  Homeland  Security,  and  Paul  McHale,  Assistant  Secretary  of  Defense  for  Home-
land Defense, convened the first meeting of the MDA Senior Steering Group. Admi-
ral  Loy’s  opening  comments  addressed  the  urgent  nature  of  the  job  at  hand,  the 
need  to  draw  on  the  resources  of  supporting  agencies,  and  the  move  beyond  study 
to deployable capabilities. He made reference to the roll out of the U.S. Commission 
on Ocean Policy Report and noted the reference to an IOOS. He remarked, ‘‘If that’s 
not  Maritime  Domain  Awareness,  I  don’t  know  what  is.’’  Admiral  Loy  recognizes 
interagency capabilities can be leveraged for a proactive, forward deployed maritime 
defense. 

As  a  part  of  this  overall  program,  USCG  and  NOAA  are  developing  marine  two-
way  communications  systems  on  NOAA  data  buoys  to  relay  Automated  Identifica-
tion  Signals  (AIS)  through  satellite  links  to  the  USCG  for  vessel  tracking.  AIS  is 
a  shipboard  system  that  broadcasts  vessel  data  such  as  name,  course,  speed,  and 
call  sign  to  other  AIS  vessels  and  stations  for  collision  avoidance  at  sea.  AIS  pre-
viously  was  only  carried  by  VHF  signal  and  therefore  had  a  limited  range.  The  in-
stallation  of  satellite  relays  on  NOAA  data  buoys  will  expand  the  USCG  capability 
to  monitor  and  track  vessels  approaching  U.S.  territorial  waters  well  beyond  the 
line of site limit for VHF. 

NOAA  officers,  ships,  and  Navigation  Response  Teams  surveyed  the  shipping 
channels of over 30 strategic commercial ports in 2002 to collect high-resolution im-
agery  requested  by  the  U.S.  Navy.  These  surveys  provide  the  baseline  data  of  pre-
existing  objects  so  mine  countermeasure  assets  can  be  utilized  more  effectively  to 
determine  if  a  mine  has  been  placed  on  the  sea  floor.  Using  hydrographic  survey 
techniques, NOAA is working with the Navy and USCG to improve our mine detec-
tion  capabilities  in  ports.  NOAA  and  the  Defense  Counter  Terrorism  Technology 
Support  Office  are  developing  an  Underwater  Domain  Awareness  capability  for 
ports,  harbors  and  inland  waterways.  This  partnership  will  support  USCG  with 
rapid response capabilities to better detect and classify underwater threats and en-
hance  their  ability  to  ensure  safe  and  secure  waterways  critical  for  the  transit  of 
military  and  commercial  vessels.  In  the  next  phase  of  this  partnership,  we  will  be 
focusing  on  Autonomous  Underwater  Vehicles  and  Autonomous  Surface  Vehicles  to 
improve  the  speed  and  flexibility  of  response  and  protect  survey  personnel  by  pro-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

viding greater stand-off during higher risk surveys. Remotely Operated Vehicles will 
be used for underwater surveys to localize and identify detected anomalous objects. 
NOAA  has  implemented  a  national  Vessel  Monitoring  System  (VMS)  program 
that  provides  infrastructure,  economies  of  scale  and  coordination  across  National 
Marine  Fisheries  Service  (NOAA  Fisheries)  regions  and  offices.  The  expanded  use 
of  VMS  provides  one  of  the  strongest  potential  solutions  to  supplement  traditional 
enforcement  activities.  This  system  provides  near-real  time  fishing  vessel  moni-
toring, control and surveillance throughout the U.S. Exclusive Economic Zone (EEZ), 
Pacific  Ocean,  and  Atlantic  Ocean.  It  also  provides  critical,  life  saving,  information 
to  the  Coast  Guard  in  support  of  their  response  in  Search  and  Rescue  (SAR)  mis-
sions. VMS uses the Global Positioning System (GPS), satellite communications, and 
a secure network to monitor fishing vessel compliance. However, this evolving capa-
bility  could  be  used  for  marine  enforcement  and  homeland  security  requirements 
since it can identify and track vessels, as well as provide information for a maritime 
domain  common  operating  picture.  An  expanded  VMS  could  encompass  the  entire 
nation  and  relay  near  real-time  data  to  the  USCG  for  enforcement  and  homeland 
security  purposes.  VMS,  if  fully  developed,  could  provide  extensive  observational 
coverage of our Nation’s EEZ. 
Response 

NOAA  has  a  wide  range  of  capabilities  in  its  day-to-day  operations  that  can  be 
used  to  prepare  for  catastrophic  events.  For  example,  surveying  and  charting  are 
NOAA  activities  mandated  by  Congress.  After  Hurricanes  Frances,  Ivan,  and 
Jeanne  in  2004,  NOAA  deployed  Navigation  Response  Teams  (NRT)  for  emergency 
surveying  to  quickly  reopen  Gulf  Coast  ports,  demonstrating  the  economic,  safety, 
and MDA benefits of rapidly resurveying ports and harbors. The NRTs conduct haz-
ardous  obstruction  surveys  along  our  coasts  to  update  NOAA  nautical  charts.  They 
also  serve  as  research  platforms  testing  equipment  and  developing  new  ways  to  ef-
fectively and efficiently survey navigable waterways. 

NOAA’s hydrographic survey vessels are occasionally called upon by the USCG to 
acquire  detailed  side  scan  and  multi-beam  survey  images  for  search  and  recovery, 
as  was  the  case  following  TWA  800  and  the  EgyptAir  crashes.  In  2004,  NOAA  as-
sisted  a  USCG  investigation  by  locating  and  obtaining  high-resolution  imagery  of 
the Bow Mariner, an ethanol tanker that exploded and sank off the Virginia Capes. 
This capability is another weapon in the defense against maritime threats, as it al-
lows  ports  to  be  re-opened  quickly  and  helps  the  USCG  to  design  temporary  lanes 
and detours based on depth data. We rapidly disseminate chart updates and critical 
chart corrections to the mariner, and we can create and distribute temporary charts, 
overlays and data sets as needed by primary responders like the Coast Guard. 

NOAA’s  Hazmat  Scientific  Support  Coordinators  (SSC)  work  in  USCG  offices, 
planning  for  emergencies  and  developing  port-specific  incident  response  plans. 
These  plans  highlight  specific  problems,  such  as  those  faced  by  chemical  facilities 
in  port  areas.  NOAA  also  develops  computer  programs  used  for  both  incident-spe-
cific  planning  and  routine  training.  This  preparedness  training  is  vital  because, 
when an event occurs, first responders need to have a range of tools they are famil-
iar with and can apply. NOAA SSCs are then able to go on-site during emergencies 
to bring all of NOAA’s support resources to the table. 

When  discussing  NOAA’s  response  capabilities,  it  would  be  remiss  of  me  not  to 
mention the NOAA Corps, one of the Nation’s seven Uniformed Services. These offi-
cers  primarily  have  science  and  engineering  backgrounds,  stand  ready  to  support 
the  Coast  Guard,  Department  of  Defense  (DoD),  and  any  other  federal  agency  that 
requires  assistance  in  protecting  the  Nation’s  security.  At  the  request  of  the  DoD, 
NOAA  has  provided  a  summary  of  its  capabilities,  ships  and  aircraft  that  could  be 
used  in  a  national  emergency.  NOAA’s  Office  of  Marine  and  Aviation  Operations 
(OMAO)  operates  a  diverse  fleet  of  research  and  hydrographic  coastal  and  ocean-
going  vessels  ranging  in  length  from  90  to  274  feet,  as  well  as  helicopters  and  air-
planes.  OMAO  abilities  to  assist  port  security  efforts  include  assisting  the  USCG 
boarding  or  inspection  parties,  supporting  port/harbor  security,  providing  sophisti-
cated  airborne  chemical  detection  support,  conducting  hydrographic  surveying/sea 
floor  mapping  and  Geographic  Information  System  (GIS)  development,  conducting 
state-of-the-art sonar operations, and providing additional hurricane reconnaissance 
if U.S. Air Force assets are reassigned. 
Space Based Assets 

The National Environmental Satellite, Data and Information Service provides real 
and  near-real  time  satellite  imagery  through  geostationary  and  polar-orbiting  envi-
ronmental satellites. NOAA acquires and manages the Nation’s operational environ-
mental satellites and provides data and information services. Information and obser-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

vations  from  NOAA’s  orbital  assets  are  used  in  weather  forecasting,  aviation  and 
marine operations, agricultural applications, on-scene weather support for incidents, 
sea  surface  temperature  measurements  for  the  fishing  industry,  and  volcanic  ash 
detection and tracking. However, they can also be used for security purposes. 

NOAA  satellite  imagery  detected  the  smoke  plume  emanating  from  New  York 
City  following  the  events  of  September  11,  2001.  Using  the  NOAA  Geostationary 
Operational  Environmental  Satellite  (GOES),  we  were  able  to  detect  the  develop-
ment  and  dispersion  of  that  smoke  plume.  Monitoring  the  extent  and  the  direction 
of the plume helped to define areas of potential health risk from hazardous particu-
lates  in  the  plume.  NOAA  provided  emergency  satellite  frequencies  for  the  health 
community to relay measurements from air quality sensors at the World Trade Cen-
ter site. 

NOAA  licenses  and  enforces  compliance  with  federal  regulations  for  operating  a 
commercial  or  private  earth  observing  satellite.  Enforcement  of  the  regulations  ap-
plying to shutter control or restriction of data distribution is essential to ensure na-
tional  security.  NOAA  enforces  stated  limitations  of  the  Kyl-Bingaman  Act  prohib-
iting  U.S.  commercial  satellite  companies  from  collecting  and  releasing  imagery  of 
specified areas. 

NOAA’s  orbital  assets  also  support  international  search  and  rescue  efforts.  The 
satellites  carry  transponders  for  search  and  rescue  beacon  signals  from  downed  air 
and  marine  craft,  and  from  personal  locator  beacons.  NOAA’s  search  and  rescue 
function  is  part  of  an  international  program  for  detection  of  distress  signals  from 
aircraft,  vessels,  and  personal  locator  beacons.  This  global  program  relies  on,  and 
supports, other nations in the collection and processing of search and rescue signals. 
Orbital imagery and data are also used for detecting and monitoring of wild fires. 
Tracking  smoke  plumes  is  an  important  part  of  the  response  to  a  fire  event  as  it 
may create health problems and visibility issues. Wind and other weather data from 
the satellites, when paired with the smoke plume detection help us understand the 
extent of the fire, and support other agencies with firefighting responsibilities. Most 
frequently, when NOAA satellites detect a plume it is the result of a volcanic erup-
tion.  The  United  States  has  a  number  of  active  volcanoes,  notably  Mt.  Spurr  in 
Alaska,  and  Mt.  St.  Helens  in  Washington,  which  are  in  heavy  aviation  corridors. 
Eruptive events create very real threats to the aviation industry. 
Coordinating Homeland Security Programs 

As I have outlined today, NOAA continues to form collaborative partnerships with 
state,  local  and  federal  entities  charged  with  addressing  homeland  security  issues. 
Through  the  Homeland  Security  Program  Office,  we  provide  support  directly  to 
DHS.  NOAA  staffs  a  desk  at  the  Homeland  Security  Operations  Center  (HSOC)  to 
provide  operational  communications,  information  and  resource  coordination  sup-
porting  management  of  domestic  Incidents  of  National  Significance  and  National 
Special Security Events. The Homeland Security Program Office plays a vital coordi-
nation  role  as  the  NOAA  point  of  entry  into  Homeland  Security  operations  and  is 
responsible  for  keeping  NOAA  executive  management  appropriately  informed  and 
engaged. 

The  Interagency  Incident  Management  Group  (IIMG)  is  a  DHS  led  structure  fa-
cilitating  a  comprehensive,  integrated  and  coordinated  approach  to  domestic  inci-
dent  management.  The  IIMG  is  collocated  and  supported  by  the  HSOC  staff.  IIMG 
members  provide  decision-making  support  to  the  Secretary  of  Homeland  Security 
and other national authorities during periods of elevated alert and national-level do-
mestic  incidents.  Specifically,  NOAA  provides  subject-matter  experts  supporting 
chemical, radiological, and nuclear weapons of mass destruction events and natural 
disasters. 

Citizen  Corps  was  launched  by  DHS  ‘‘as  a  community  based  initiative  to  engage 
all  citizens  in  homeland  security  and  community  safety  and  family  preparedness 
through  public  education  and  outreach,  training  opportunities,  and  volunteer  pro-
grams.’’ In July 2003 a Statement of Affiliation between DHS and NOAA was signed 
by Undersecretary Michael Brown and me in order to establish a collaborative part-
nership raising public awareness about weather and environmental hazards as well 
as promoting actions for public safety. 

NOAA Fisheries’ Office for Law Enforcement is dedicated primarily to the enforce-
ment  of  laws  that  protect  and  regulate  our  Nation’s  living  marine  resources  and 
their  natural  habitat.  NOAA  Fisheries’  special  agents  and  enforcement  officers  en-
force many federal statutes, as well as numerous treaties related to the conservation 
and  protection  of  marine  resources  through  the  prosecution  of  both  civil  and  crimi-
nal violations. Notwithstanding OLE’s joint enforcement partnerships with 27 coast-
al  state  agencies,  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  continues  to  be  OLE’s  strongest  ally  in  en-
forcing  marine  resource  laws  and  fishery  management.  The  cooperative  support 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

from  the  Coast  Guard  enables  OLE  agents  and  officers  to  actively  respond  to  sus-
pected violations that might otherwise be unattainable. 

With  increased  emphasis  on  Homeland  Security  and  inter-agency  collaboration, 
OLE’s  expertise  has  also  been  applied  to  various  task  forces  and  maritime  security 
initiatives  nationwide  including  MDA,  border  operations  and  checkpoints,  and  dock 
patrols. 
Conclusion 

In NOAA’s unique role as an information provider, we will continue to work close-
ly  with  our  partners  to  support  the  Nation  with  a  wide  range  of  services  and  prod-
ucts  from  hazardous  material  spill  response  capabilities  to  atmospheric  and  water-
borne  dispersion  forecasting  and  support  for  communities  and  emergency  respond-
ers. NOAA also is ready to provide NOAA’s ships, aircraft, global observing systems, 
and professional law enforcement officers to serve the Nation when the need arises. 
Thank you for inviting me here today to talk about NOAA’s homeland security pro-
grams.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
Dr. Bement? 

STATEMENT OF DR. ARDEN L. BEMENT, JR., DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION 

Dr.  BEMENT.  Good  afternoon,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member 

Nelson, and Subcommittee staff. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  testimony  on  the  Na-
tional  Science  Foundation’s  role 
in  advancing  science-and-
engineering’s capability to enhance the Nation’s homeland security. 
My  written  testimony  details  a  number  of  NSF  programs  that 
are  central  to  creating  knowledge  that  will  have  applications  in 
homeland  security.  It  also  notes  how  NSF’s  research  programs  re-
late  to  threats  and  countermeasures  identified  in  an  April  report 
released  by  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  entitled 
‘‘Science and Technology: A Foundation for Homeland Security.’’ I’ll 
touch  on  a  few  topics  from  my  written  testimony,  and  will  start 
with disaster response. 

For more than three decades, NSF has supported quick-response 
disaster  studies  that  dispatched  scientists  and  engineers  to  the 
aftermath  of  crises  ranging  from  natural  phenomena  to  manmade. 
Researchers  were  in  the  field  within  days  after  both  the  terrorist 
attacks  of  September  11,  2001,  and  the  recent  South  Asian  tsu-
nami, to gather critical data before it was lost to nature and recon-
struction.  This  ephemeral  information,  including  assessments  of 
physical  damage  to  built  and  natural  environments  and  social  re-
sponses, is critical to help emergency teams and local leaders better 
direct  future  rescue  efforts,  and  is  vital  to  understanding  and  pre-
paring for future disasters. 

Second, on detection of CBRNE materials, especially fissile mate-
rials,  a  critical  capability  needed  to  defend  against  nuclear  pro-
liferation and to prevent a nuclear or radiological weapon from en-
tering  the  country  is  the  ability  to  detect  the  presence  of  illicit 
fissile  materials.  To  detect  such  contraband,  new  sentinel  systems 
and detectors enabled by critical advances in the material sciences 
must  be  fielded  at  home  and  abroad.  It  is  widely  believed  that 
nanotechnology  will  lead  to  the  advances  required  to  enable  these 
systems. 

As a lead agency of the National Nanotechnology Initiative, NSF 
restructured  the  program  last  year,  in  part  to  accelerate  the  real-
ization  of  new  nanostructured  materials,  and,  therefore,  hastened 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

developments  to  detect  chemical,  biological,  radiological,  nuclear, 
and explosive materials. 

Next,  to  data  mining.  One  subject  of  intense  interest  in  the  aca-
demic  research  community  comes  under  the  rubric  of  data  mining. 
When  large  amounts  of  data  are  available,  whether  information 
from scientific equipment, health records, or e-mail traffic, it is im-
portant to be able to extract meaning from that information. Data-
mining applications and computers, generally, have a difficult time 
understanding what the language and the message actually means. 
NSF-funded  researchers  are  developing  techniques  to  provide 
standardized  ‘‘who  did  what  to  whom,  when,  and  where’’  versions 
of  messages  written  in  English,  Chinese,  and  Arabic.  The  under-
lying techniques have applicability in many areas beyond homeland 
security, such as financial and healthcare fraud detection. 

Next, cybersecurity. In the area of cybersecurity, NSF will be es-
tablishing a new collaborative cybersecurity science and technology 
center  this  year  at  the  University  of  California  at  Berkeley.  This 
new  cybersecurity  center  will  investigate  key  issues  of  computer 
trustworthiness  in  an  era  of  increasing  attacks,  at  all  levels,  on 
computer systems and information-based technologies. 

NSF-supported  basic  research  in  important  areas  as  varied 
nanotechnology,  linguistics,  deception  detection,  genomics,  microbi-
ology, engineered systems, and sensor development is critical to de-
velop  the  knowledge  base  that  will  protect  us  against  existing  and 
future threats. 

But  perhaps  the  most  important  investment  NSF  makes  in  the 
area  of  homeland  security  is  the  education  of  the  Nation’s  future 
science  and  engineering  workforce.  Unfortunately,  we  now  see 
warnings  that  America’s  advantage  in  scientific  and  engineering 
capital  is  eroding.  The  obvious  alternative  to  importing  S&E  man-
power  to  fill  the  gaps  is  to  grow  more  of  our  own.  We  desperately 
need  to  broaden  participation  in  science  and  engineering  by  both 
increasing  the  fraction  of  the  general  population  of  students  in 
these  fields,  and  by  increasing  participation  by  under-represented 
groups. 

I am pleased to note that more than 20,000 minority students re-
ceive  science  and  engineering  bachelors  degree  each  year  from  the 
institutions in the NSF alliances for minority participation. Merely 
doubling  the  fraction  of  these  who  continue  on  to  the  Ph.D.  would 
be a major contribution to America’s domestic S&E manpower. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  National  Science  Foundation  is  committed  to 
the advancement of studies that have direct impact on our Nation’s 
homeland  security.  Our  dedicated  program  staff  understands  the 
significance  that  science  and  engineering  have  on  security.  We 
work to ensure that capabilities at the frontiers of science and engi-
neering  today  will  keep  pace  with  the  advances  and  threats  of  to-
morrow. 

NSF  works  in  collaboration  with  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security,  the  intelligence  community,  the  Department  of  Defense, 
the  Department  of  Energy,  federal  labs,  and  the  private  sector  to 
ensure that this wealth of knowledge is effectively transferred into 
capabilities  critical  for  advancement  in  many  areas,  including 
homeland security. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

In  an  increasingly  demanding  and  unpredictable  security  envi-
ronment,  NSF  will  continue  to  help  shape  a  more  prosperous  and 
secure future for ourselves, our children, and future generations. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Ranking  Member  Nelson,  thank  you,  again, 
for  this  opportunity  to  testify  on  a  topic  of  great  importance,  and 
I would be pleased to answer any questions you may have. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Bement follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. ARDEN L. BEMENT, JR., DIRECTOR, NATIONAL SCIENCE 

FOUNDATION 

Good  afternoon.  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Nelson,  and  Members  of  the 
Subcommittee, thank you very much for the opportunity to present testimony on the 
National Science Foundation’s role in advancing science and engineering’s capability 
to enhance our Nation’s homeland security. 

As  you  know,  when  Congress  established  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF) 
in  1950,  it  gave  the  agency  a  broad  mission:  ‘‘to  promote  the  progress  of  science; 
to  advance  the  national  health,  prosperity,  and  welfare;  and  to  secure  the  national 
defense . . .’’ As such, much of NSF’s activity directly supports our Nation’s ability 
to  secure  the  homeland.  NSF  plays  a  critical  role  in  underwriting  fundamental  re-
search,  education  and  infrastructure  at  colleges,  universities  and  other  institutions 
throughout  the  country.  This  effort  produces  future  generations  of  world-class  sci-
entists  and  engineers  who  develop  ideas  and  research  tools  that  address  the  chal-
lenges we face today and those we will face in the future. 

Research supported by NSF accounts for approximately 13 percent of federal sup-
port  for  basic  research  and  approximately  40  percent  of  non-life-science  basic  re-
search  at  U.S.  academic  institutions  while  representing  less  than  4  percent  of  the 
federal funding for R&D. This work, at the frontiers of knowledge, represents much 
of our Nation’s most advanced capability in materials science research, sensors and 
the architecture of sensor networks, genomics, cyber-security, data mining, and un-
derstanding  of  human  and  social  dynamics,  among  others.  Much  of  this  work  has 
direct  impact  upon  our  Nation’s  present  and  future-generation  homeland  security 
systems and capability. 

The  April  2005  report  from  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP), 
Science  and  Technology:  A  Foundation  for  Homeland  Security,  identifies  the  fol-
lowing  areas  where  our  Nation’s  research  communities  will  play  vital  roles:  (1) 
Science  and  Technology  For  Defense  Against  Catastrophic  Threats  and  (2)  Science 
and  Technology  to  Counter  Terrorism.  NSF  has  supported  basic  research  in  these 
two  areas  from  the  Foundation’s  origins  and  much  of  today’s  capabilities  can  trace 
their  lineage  back  to  NSF-sponsored  fundamental  work.  Moreover,  in  response  to 
emerging  threats,  NSF  has  increased  support  for  several  activities  outlined  as  crit-
ical  in  the  OSTP  report.  What  I  outline  below  are  some  of  the  activities  sponsored 
by NSF that directly address the topics the OSTP report identifies as critical to ad-
vance  our  Nation’s  science  and  technology  base  for  supporting  homeland  security. 
The National Science Foundation Research Portfolio: 
CBRNE 

As a first example, the OSTP report identifies Radiological and Nuclear Counter-
measures as a key component to countering the threat of weapons proliferation, and 
the  2002  National  Strategy  for  Homeland  Security  states:  ‘‘Our  highest  scientific 
priority  must  be  preventing  terrorist  use  of  nuclear  weapons.’’  A  critical  component 
capability  to  defend  against  nuclear  proliferation  and  inhibit  border  penetration  by 
a nuclear or radiological weapon is the ability to detect the presence of illicit fissile 
material. To detect such contraband, new sentinel systems and detectors enabled by 
critical  advances  in  material  sciences  must  be  fielded  at  home  and  abroad.  It  is 
widely  believed  among  the  scientific  community  that  nanotechnology  will  lead  the 
way  to  the  advanced  capability  in  material  sciences  required  to  enable  these  sys-
tems.  As  the  lead  agency  of  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  (NNI),  NSF  di-
rected the 2004 restructuring of the NNI in part to accelerate the realization of new 
nano-structured materials and therefore hasten developments to enhance our ability 
to  detect  Chemical,  Biological,  Radiological,  Nuclear  and  Explosive  (CBRNE)  mate-
rials. 

The OSTP report also identifies early detection of Biological and Chemical Threat 
Agents  as  a  critical  capability  required  to  enhance  our  Nation’s  homeland  security. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

The  early  detection  of  Biological  and  Chemical  Threats,  like  the  ability  to  detect 
fissile  material,  requires  advanced  knowledge  of  material  science  and  sensor  engi-
neering. NSF supports both of these activities within and beyond the NNI. 

For instance, NSF funds the Materials Research Science and Engineering Centers 
program.  These  centers  are  located  at  leading  academic  institutions  in  seventeen 
states  across  the  country  and  represent  a  significant  portion  of  our  Nation’s  most 
advanced work in the area of material science. NSF also co-funds a program titled: 
Interaction 
in  Chemistry,  Materials  Research,  Molecular  Biosciences,  Bio-
engineering,  and  Chemical  Engineering  with  the  National  Institute  of  Standards 
and Technology (NIST). This program was developed to facilitate the interaction be-
tween NSF-sponsored academic researchers and NIST’s Chemical Science and Tech-
nology Laboratory and Materials Science and Engineering Laboratory. These labora-
tories house NIST’s activity on chemistry, materials research, molecular biology, bio-
engineering,  and  chemical  engineering,  all  relevant  to  advancing  our  capability  for 
detecting chemical and biological threats. 
Sensors and Sensor Networks 

In  the  area  of  advanced  sensors,  NSF’s  Sensors  and  Sensor  Networks  program 
seeks  to  advance  fundamental  knowledge  in  the  engineering  of  materials,  concepts 
and  designs  for  new  sensors,  networked  sensor  systems  in  a  distributed  environ-
ment  and  the  interpretation  and  use  of  sensor  data  in  decision-making  processes. 
Like most of the activity sponsored by NSF, the capabilities enabled represent state-
of-the  art  research  at  the  frontiers  of  knowledge  and  comprise  a  significant  propor-
tion  of  our  Nation’s  most  advanced  work  on  sensor  and  sensor  systems.  This  work 
includes  research  that  investigates  networks  for  health  monitoring  and  damage  as-
sessment  of  the  civil  infrastructure,  both  physical  and  cyber.  Flexible  and  scalable 
software  architectures  and  frameworks  are  being  developed  to  integrate  real-time 
heterogeneous  sensor  data,  database  and  archiving  systems,  computer  vision,  data 
analysis  and  interpretation,  numerical  simulation  of  complex  structural  systems, 
visualization,  probabilistic  risk  analysis,  and  rational  statistical  decision  making 
procedures. 

To  highlight  some  of  this  advanced  activity,  NSF  sponsored  a  media  briefing  last 
September  titled  ‘‘Sensors:  Buildings,  Battlefields,  and  Beyond’’  which  described 
what  many  of  our  Nation’s  top  technology  leaders  believe  is  the  next  generation  of 
the  information  technology  revolution,  namely  the  ability  to  augment  our  advanced 
computational resources with a wide array of geographically-distributed sensor data. 
Clearly,  this  focus  on  sensor  and  sensor  networks  will  have  impact  in  the  area  of 
homeland security. 

The  OSTP  report  also  identifies  Medical  Countermeasures  to  Weapons  of  Mass 
Destruction  (WMD)  as  a  critical  capability  where  our  Science  and  Technology  com-
munity  can  contribute.  While  most  of  our  Nation’s  work  in  this  area  is  supported 
by  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  NSF  has  and  will  continue  to 
play  a  significant  role.  NSF,  in  collaboration  with  the  Department  of  Agriculture, 
has  funded  a  program  on  microbial  genome  sequencing  that  provides  key  informa-
tion  enabling  identification  and  understanding  of  the  life  functions  and  ecology  of 
microbes, some of which have the potential to be used in biological-based WMD. The 
genome sequence of these microbes, once known, can be utilized to develop counter-
measures such as antimicrobial chemicals and vaccines. This jointly funded program 
also relates directly to protecting our agricultural systems from both man-made and 
naturally  occurring  threats,  also  identified  in  the  OSTP  report  as  a  critical  initia-
tive. 
Agriculture 

Protecting agriculture and our food supply represents a unique area where a syn-
thesis  of  NSF  activity  contributes  to  our  Nation’s  homeland  security.  As  stated 
above,  NSF  co-sponsors  research  into  microbial  gene  sequencing  and  sponsors  sen-
sor  and  sensor  networks,  both  of  which  are  directly  related  to  securing  our  agricul-
tural  supply  chain.  NSF  also  supports  the  Biochemical  Engineering  and  Bio-
technology  program  which  funds  technology  development  for  the  purpose  of  moni-
toring  and  controlling  bioprocesses  and  food  processing  with  a  special  focus  on  the 
safety of the Nation’s food supply. 

Another area of activity that NSF supports is the Environmental Engineering and 
Technology program. This program focuses on research with the goal of reducing ad-
verse  effects  of  solid,  liquid,  and  gaseous  discharges  into  land,  fresh  and  ocean  wa-
ters, and air as a result of human activity. This program also supports research on 
innovative biological, chemical, and physical processes used alone or as components 
of  engineered  systems  to  restore  the  usefulness  of  polluted  land,  water,  and  air  re-
sources.  The  understanding  of  these  engineered  systems  will  lead  to  advanced  na-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

tional  capabilities  in  the  area  of  remediation,  an  area  directly  related  to  homeland 
security. 

The OSTP report identifies Biometric Identification as a critical need and has cre-
ated  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council’s  Subcommittee  on  Biometrics. 
NSF  is  represented  on  this  subcommittee  and  also  sponsors  advanced  research  at 
the Center for Identification Technology Research as well as numerous grants to the 
small  business  community  that  advance  state-of-the  art  biometric  capability  in  a 
commercial setting. 
First Responders 

To  enhance  first  responder  capability,  NSF  has  sponsored  work  in  advanced  ad-
hoc  networking  to  enable  the  rapid  deployment  of  communications  networks.  Along 
with  the  Department  of  Defense,  NSF  has  sponsored  the  Center  for  Robot  Assisted 
Search  and  Rescue.  To  advance  the  first-responders  capacity  to  deal  with  chemical 
and  biological  threats,  NSF  has  sponsored  work  that  led  to  the  development  of  an 
advanced  material  nano-engineered  to  quickly  absorb  and  destroy  a  wide  array  of 
toxic  chemicals.  The  commercial  development  of  this  material  also  is  being  spon-
sored by an NSF Small Business Innovation Research (SBIR) grant. This is one ex-
ample where original fundamental NSF-supported academic research and the subse-
quent support from the NSF SBIR program has directly led to a potentially signifi-
cant  advance  in  the  area  of  homeland  security.  The  small  business  concern  is  cur-
rently  working  with  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency  to  develop  capability  for 
water remediation. 
Information Technology 

Another  critical  area  that  pertains  to  homeland  security  where  NSF  is  actively 
supporting  our  Nation’s  capabilities  is  in  the  area  of  Information  Technology.  Spe-
cifically NSF, in collaboration with the Department of Homeland Security, supports 
the Cyber Defense Technology Experimental Research network, a collaborative net-
work  developed  as  a  testbed  for  cyber  war  gaming.  NSF  also  supports  the  Center 
for  Internet  Epidemiology  and  Defenses,  which  is  dedicated  to  wiping  out  worms 
and viruses that infect thousands of computers and cause billions of dollars in dam-
age. These two centers represent just a small fraction of the Information Technology 
Research NSF supports that is directly relevant to homeland security. 

Computers, especially those that are networked, reside at the heart of systems on 
which  people  now  rely,  both  in  critical  national  infrastructures  and  in  their  homes, 
cars,  and  offices.  Today,  many  of  these  systems  are  far  too  vulnerable  to  cyber  at-
tacks that can inhibit their function, corrupt important data, or expose private infor-
mation. 

To respond to these challenges, NSF established a new program in FY 2004 called 
Cyber  Trust  to  complement  ongoing  cybersecurity  research  and  education  invest-
ments  made  in  the  core  Computer  and  Information  Science  and  Engineering  pro-
grams. The Cyber Trust program promotes a vision of a society in which networked 
computer systems are more predictable, more accountable, and less vulnerable to at-
tack  and  abuse.  It  also  foresees  systems  that  are  developed,  configured,  operated 
and  evaluated  by  a  well-trained  and  diverse  workforce  and  used  by  a  public  edu-
cated  in  their  secure  and  ethical  operation.  As  such,  the  program  covers  a  wide 
range  of  research  areas.  In  FY  2006,  focused  investments  in  this  area  will  be  both 
in  foundation  establishment  and  security-measure  development.  The  former  is  im-
portant since we will only be able to develop predictably trustworthy computer sys-
tems  if  we  can  model  and  analyze  cyber-trust-related  phenomena.  Given  security 
threats faced today, we also need to accelerate developing technologies that can im-
mediately address these threats. 

I  would  note  that  we  chose  the  title  ‘‘Cyber  Trust’’  because  our  understanding  is 
that the public not only wants their information systems to be secure, but that they 
want  to  trust  them  in  all  kinds  of  situations.  As  a  simple  example,  they  need  to  be 
able to trust that data will be kept private. 

In  the  area  of  cybersecurity,  NSF  announced  in  mid-April  our  intention  to  estab-
lish  two  new  Science  and  Technology  Centers  (STCs)  in  Fiscal  Year  2005—one  a 
major  collaborative  cybersecurity  project  led  by  the  University  of  California,  Berke-
ley.  This  new  cybersecurity  center  will  investigate  key  issues  of  computer  trust-
worthiness  in  an  era  of  increasing  attacks  at  all  levels  on  computer  systems  and 
information-based  technologies.  The  Team  for  Research  in  Ubiquitous  Secure  Tech-
nology  (TRUST)  will  address  a  parallel  and  accelerating  trend  of  the  past  decade—
the  integration  of  computing  and  communication  across  critical  infrastructures  in 
areas  such  as  finance,  energy  distribution,  telecommunications  and  transportation. 
The  center  will  merge  these  efforts  with  investigations  of  social  science  questions 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

involving  economics,  public  policy  and  societal  challenges,  human-computer  inter-
faces and privacy, among other issues. 

NSF  also  supports  a  significant  amount  of  work  in  the  area  of  data  mining  and 
the  Intelligence  Community  has  provided  supplemental  funds  to  further  NSF-spon-
sored research within this area. For example, novel data mining-based anomaly de-
tection techniques developed under NSF support have been incorporated in the Min-
nesota Intrusion Detection System (MINDS) that help cybersecurity analysts detect 
intrusions and other undesirable activity in real life networks. MINDS is being used 
at  the  Army  Research  Laboratory  Center  for  Intrusion  Monitoring  and  Protection 
and  at  the  University  of  Minnesota  to  successfully  detect  novel  intrusions,  policy 
violations,  and  insider  abuse  that  cannot  be  identified  by  widely  used  signature-
based  tools.  MINDS  allows  cybersecurity  experts  to  quickly  analyze  massive 
amounts  of  network  traffic,  as  they  only  need  to  evaluate  the  most  anomalous  con-
nections  identified  by  the  system.  Further  summarization  of  these  anomalous  con-
nections  using  association  pattern  analysis  helps  in  understanding  the  nature  of 
cyber  attacks,  as  well  as  in  creating  new  signatures  for  use  in  intrusion  detection 
systems.  The  underlying  techniques  have  applicability  in  many  areas  beyond 
cybersecurity, such as financial and health care fraud detection. 

In addition, NSF has and continues to sponsor research in the following areas re-

lated to cyber-security:

a) security of next generation operating systems, 
b) forensic and law enforcement foundations, 
c) human computer interfaces for security functions, 
d) theoretical foundations and mechanisms for privacy, security and trust, 
e) improved ability to certify system security properties, 
f)  more  effective  system  monitoring,  anomaly  detection  attack  recognition  and 
defense, and 
g) integrating hardware and software for security.

The  Federal  Cyber  Service  Scholarship  for  Service  (SFS)  is  a  program  co-spon-
sored by NSF and DHS that seeks to increase the number of qualified students en-
tering the fields of information assurance and computer security. The SFS program 
provides  scholarship  money  for  a  maximum  of  2  years  to  outstanding  cybersecurity 
undergraduate  and  graduate  students  in  exchange  for  an  equal  amount  of  time 
spent  in  Federal  Government  service  after  graduation.  The  SFS  has  supported  stu-
dents who have gone on to either internships or post-graduation employment within, 
among  others,  the  following  agencies:  CIA,  DoD  (Defense  Computer  Forensics  Lab, 
NSA), DoE, DHS, DOJ (FBI, CIO), NSF and NASA. 
Social, Behavioral, & Economic Sciences 

The OSTP report, as well as the recently released report by the National Science 
and Technology Council, Combating Terrorism: Research Priorities in the Social, Be-
havioral, and Economic Sciences, identifies research on cultural and sociological fac-
tors that may give rise to an environment conducive to terrorism as well as research 
into  individual  behavioral  indicators  that  may  correlate  with  intent  to  harm  as  im-
portant areas of study for the science and technology community. In this connection, 
NSF  grants  have  enabled  the  sophisticated  incorporation  of  geographic  and  other 
spatial  data  into  analyses  of  human  behavior,  they  have  advanced  our  under-
standing  of  how  networks  link  people  and  organizations,  and  have  supported  sur-
veys on religious and democratic values in Islamic and third world countries. 

In  order  to  better  understand  the  complex  dynamics  within  and  among  human 
and  social  systems  and  their  environments,  NSF  has  recently  initiated  a  5  year, 
agency-wide  research  program  in  human  and  social  dynamics.  Emerging  research 
and  tools  will  provide  a  window  into  the  human  mind  that  will  revolutionize  the 
study  of  human  development  and  cognition,  as  well  as  information  processing  and 
decision-making  by  groups  and  individuals.  Areas  critical  to  homeland  security  in-
clude agents of change, ranging from extremist ideologies to modern technology; the 
dynamics  of  human  behavior,  which  includes  such  topics  as  effective  human-ma-
chine interfacing, and decision-making and risk, which has special relevance to pre-
venting,  communicating  about  and  recovering  from  the  destructive  consequences  of 
extreme events. 

The  Intelligence  Community  and  NSF  are  also  sponsoring  research  on  the  detec-
tion  of  deception  that  includes  investigation  and  development  of  behavioral  bio-
metrics (measurable behavior traits acquired over time), content analysis in foreign 
documents  and  speech,  alternatives  to  the  polygraph,  and  improvements  in  intel-
ligence analysis by increasing our understanding of thought processes, learning, and 
decision-making in individuals and teams. Recently, NSF initiated a 5 year research 
program  in  human  and  social  dynamics.  Emerging  research  and  tools  will  provide 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

a window into the human mind that will revolutionize the study of human develop-
ment  and  cognition,  as  well  as  information  processing  and  decision-making  by 
groups  and  individuals.  Areas  critical  to  homeland  security  include  agents  of 
change,  ranging  from  extremist  ideologies  to  modern  technology;  the  dynamics  of 
human  behavior;  and  decision-making  and  risk,  which  has  special  relevance  to  ex-
treme events. 
Fielding Advanced Capabilities 

In addition to the programs outlined above which directly support the OSTP-iden-
tified areas of vital Science and Technology for securing our homeland, NSF is sup-
porting  research  at  the  frontiers  for  fielding  advanced  capability  for  future-genera-
tion needs. Some of this work is supported by the Foundation’s SBIR/STTR program 
that, in accordance with the FY05 Interagency Research and Development Priorities 
announced by the Directors of OSTP and the Office of Management and Budget, cre-
ated a cross-disciplinary program to address specific opportunities for developing Se-
curity  Technologies.  The  SBIR/STTR  Security  Technologies  subtopics  were  devel-
oped in collaboration with the DoD, DHS and the Intelligence Community. With this 
program, NSF only supports leading edge Security Technologies enabled by the con-
vergence  of  two  of  the  following  three  technologies:  nanotechnology,  biotechnology 
and information technology. The capabilities envisioned by the convergence of these 
technologies  are  considered  to  be  among  the  most  profound  in  human  history  and 
NSF believes that the advancements supported by this effort will lead to capabilities 
in the years and decades to come. 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  can  see  from  the  numerous  examples  above,  the  National 
Science  Foundation  is  committed  to  the  advancement  of  studies  that  have  a  direct 
impact on our Nation’s homeland security. Our dedicated program staff understands 
the  significance  that  science  and  engineering  have  on  security  and  works  to  ensure 
that  capabilities  at  the  frontiers  of  science  and  engineering  today  will  keep  pace 
with  the  advances  and  threats  of  tomorrow.  By  supporting  work  that  advances  the 
Nation’s  health,  prosperity  and  welfare,  NSF  is  instrumental  in  influencing  the  fu-
ture  of  scientific  endeavor.  NSF  works  in  collaboration  with  DHS,  the  Intelligence 
Community,  DoD,  DOE,  our  federal  labs  and  the  private  sector  to  ensure  that  this 
wealth  of  knowledge  is  effectively  transferred  into  capabilities  critical  for  advance-
ment in many areas, including homeland security. The National Science Foundation 
will  continue  to  participate  in  a  multidisciplinary  approach  to  the  challenges  faced 
by  the  engineering  and  scientific  community  in  a  way  that  will  impact  our  country 
for generations to come. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  again  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  on  a  topic  of  great 
importance.  I  hope  that  I  have  conveyed  the  serious  approach  that  NSF  has  taken 
to address these issues. I would be pleased to answer any questions you might have.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
I’d  like  to  invite  Senator  Nelson,  our  Ranking  Member,  to  make 

a statement and to start the questions. 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chair-
man.  I  appreciate  very  much  your  scheduling  this  hearing,  and  I 
look  forward  to  working  with  you  this  year  on  these  critical  issues 
of  safety  and  welfare,  and,  in  many  cases,  health,  as  well.  And  I 
appreciate the appearance of our witnesses today. 

The  first  hearing  is  not  necessarily  focused  on  natural  disasters, 
but,  whatever  we  talk  about  relates  to  either  manmade  disasters 
or  natural  disasters,  because  we’re  talking  about  preparedness, 
warnings; and a lot of the technology that is there can serve many 
different  purposes.  And  I  commend  all  of  you  for  working,  as  best 
you  can,  to  share  and  double-function  your  technologies  to  do  as 
much as you can possibly do to make us all safer, in only—in a way 
that only, I think, you can do that. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

26

Obviously,  the  ability  to  extend  a  warning  about  a  bioterror  at-
tack to the public, and also warn them of a tornado—I have visited 
the National Weather Service, just outside of the city of Omaha, in 
Valley,  Nebraska,  just  within  the  last  couple  of  months  to  take  a 
very  close  look  at  what  capabilities  they  have.  It  strikes  me,  also, 
that,  while  you  wouldn’t  consider  an  Amber  Alert  necessarily  a 
weather-related  item,  because  it’s  not,  but  the  utilization  of  that 
kind  of  technology  in  similar  situations  can  certainly  benefit  those 
who  would  have  that  great  need,  and  would  keep  us  all  safer  and 
more comfortable. So—and then if we develop lighter, stronger, and 
more  blast-proof  materials,  I  think  they  could  also  have  another 
use,  and  that’s  perhaps  to  make  our  cars  safer.  You  know,  so  pro-
tecting 
foils 
cyberterrorists,  it  also  stymies  identity  thieves  that  are  there  at 
work today. 

the  security  of  computer  networks  not  only 

So,  I’m  concerned  when  I  hear  you  say,  Dr.  Bement,  that  some-
times  science  and  technology  interests  are  falling  off.  I  know  that 
very  often  R&D  funds  are  the  first  that  are  sliced,  in  tight  eco-
nomic  times,  when,  in  fact,  they  should  be  the  last  funds  that  are 
affected. 

So,  I  commend  your  agencies  for  using  whatever  limited  re-
sources you have to do as much as you possibly can for safety and 
security.  I  must  say  that  I’m  concerned  about  the  decline  in  the 
number  of  science  and  engineering  graduates.  I  must  confess  that 
perhaps  I  was  one  of  those.  I  was  president  of  my  high-school 
science club, but I took a different route, as you can see. So, I don’t 
know  that  I  deprived  our  science  and  technology  field  of  a  great 
mind  in  that  field,  but,  certainly,  we  do  have  to  do  what  we  can 
to  build  back  for  more  scientific  careers.  We  recognize  that,  and 
you  can  expect  a  commitment  on  my  part,  and,  I’m  sure  the  Com-
mittee’s  part,  to  try  to  help  in  any  way  that  we  can  to  rationally 
effect  greater  movement  toward  these  science,  engineering  and 
technology careers. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
A  question  from  Senator  Stevens  that  I’d  like  to  pass  along,  Ad-
miral,  to  you.  In  the  past  2  years,  Congress  has  appropriated  a 
total of 20 million to develop a national alert system, including the 
distribution of NOAA Weather Radios to schools. How many radios 
have been distributed to schools so far? And do you have sufficient 
funding in the budget to complete the task? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  The  radios  have  not  been  distributed 
yet.  We’re  very  close  to  doing  that.  The  money  was  distributed  to 
the Department of Homeland Security, so we’ve developed a memo-
randum  of  understanding,  and  have  had  to  determine  where  we 
would distribute them. Right now, the plans are following, to start 
with two rural states, who happen to be Alaska and Mississippi, for 
Senator  Stevens’  edification,  and  then  to  the  top  10  to  15  urban 
areas,  high-security  urban  areas,  as  on  our—as  agreed  to  by  the 
Department  of  Homeland  Security  on  their  list,  starting  with  New 
York,  Chicago  and  Washington.  So,  the  plan  is,  within  the  next  6 
months,  to  start  working  our  way  down  the  major  cities,  and  then 
the  rural  states.  And  there  is  not  sufficient  funding  yet  to  do  the 
entire  Nation,  but  this  is  a  pretty  good  dent  in  that  task,  and  we 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

appreciate  the  fine  support  we’ve  had  in  getting  help  for  this 
project. 

Senator  DEMINT.  It  would  be  helpful  if  you  kept  the  Committee 

informed as to how that progress went and——

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir. 
Senator DEMINT.—Senator Stevens is interested. 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I am interested. We will keep you up to 

date, sir. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Let  me  ask  you—I  guess  this  could  go  to  all 
three of our panelists—is there someone, or a group, at the Depart-
ment of Homeland Security that has called you in? As I hear about 
the  different  expertise  that  you  have  here  today,  each  expressing 
the  different  areas  where  there  might  be  a  threat  in  the  country, 
I ask how you could bring your expertise, your equipment, your re-
search  to  bear  on  that.  Is  there  someone  at  Homeland  Security 
that’s  called  you  in  to  collaborate  on  how  to  protect  the  country? 

Dr. BEMENT. Well, I can start. 
First  of  all,  we  have  a  seat  on  the  Interagency  Working  Group 
in  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council  that  deals  with 
homeland  security,  and  a  lot  of  these  questions  get  addressed  in 
that working group. In addition to that, we are connected with the 
university  program  in  the  Department,  and  we  have  a  number  of 
joint activities with that function. And, as a matter of fact, just yes-
terday,  as  a  result  of  reading  my  written  testimony,  a  program  di-
rector at Homeland Security asked to come and talk with us about 
a possible MOU in his area of expertise. So, this continues to bub-
ble up. We thought we had all the connections made, but we’re still 
finding more as we go along. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes,  I’ve  found  similar—we  are  in  the 
beginning  of  ensuring  effective  intergovernmental  coordination—
agency  coordination,  in  my  opinion.  We  have  set  up—and  we  have 
had contact. We’ve worked with—the Deputy Secretary has come to 
talk  to  us,  and  we’ve  talked  to  them.  We  have  set  up  a  NOAA  of-
fice, or a NOAA desk, in the Homeland Security Operations Center, 
so  NOAA  is  part  of  providing  the  kinds  of  environmental  informa-
tion that the President and the entire country needs for responding 
to  any  mishaps  or  terrorism  that  might  occur.  So,  we’re  part  of 
that. 

We have made contact and discussed mutual research and devel-
opment  with  the  Research  and  Development  Directorate  in  that 
area.  And  we  have  worked  for  many,  many  years  with  the  Coast 
Guard. Coast Guard, because of our issues with enforcement in the 
EEZ and fishing rules and regulations, have been—and our naviga-
tion  responsibilities—have  worked  hand-in-glove  with  the  Coast 
Guard  forever.  So,  that  arrangement  continues  to  go  very  strong. 
We  have  formed,  together  with  a  number  of  other  agencies, 
under the Office of Federal Coordinator of Meteorology, who works 
in  the  Department  of  Commerce,  to  bring  all  the  agencies  to-
gether—an  exhaustive  inventory  and  development  of  plume  and 
dispersion  models  that  we  are  helping—what’s  now  called  the 
IMAC  come  up  with  the  preferred  models  to  use  in  various  situa-
tions. So, we are connected with that part of emergency responses, 
as  well.  So—and  we  work,  of  course,  with  FEMA,  because  of  the 
hurricane  issues  and  responses  to  flooding  and  the  types  of  things 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

where  you  need  to  have  local,  quick,  rapid  response.  FEMA  is 
hand-in-glove  with—have  been  hand-in-glove  with  our  folks  for 
many years. 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  As  I  mentioned  before,  we  do  have  an  MOU 
signed with the Department of Homeland Security. As part of that 
agreement,  we  actually  have  several  NIST  staff  members  that  are 
detailed  to  DHS  to  both  help  us  coordinate  our  mutual  work  and 
help  with  the  implementation  of  their  mission.  We  also  have  seats 
at  various  NSDC  committees  on  homeland—on  national  security, 
their  committees  on  medical  countermeasures,  biodiagnostics,  bio-
logical and chemical preparedness, regional security, infrastructure 
committees.  These  are  all  basically  framework  that  help  us  coordi-
nate our efforts, and NIST has participation in all of these commit-
tees  and  subcommittees  to  make  sure  that  our  efforts  are  coordi-
nated. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Let  me  ask  a  couple  of,  I  guess,  specific  appli-

cation-type questions. 

I know we’re concerned about the Nation’s water supply; what a 
terrorist could do to poison, or to somehow contaminate, our water 
supply.  I  know  we  have  buoys  and  monitors  that  we  use  in  the 
ocean. Have we looked at how to apply that technology to contami-
nants in water reservoirs across the country? 

Yes, sir? 
Dr.  BEMENT.  At  the  Foundation,  we  are  supporting  research  in 
water  remediation,  as  well  as  air  and  ground  remediation,  from 
various types of attacks, whether they’re fissile materials or chem-
ical or biomaterials. 

Senator  DEMINT.  Are  you  talking  about  detection  or  remedi-

Dr.  BEMENT.  I  am  talking  about  remediation,  which  I  thought 

was the core of your question. Restoring potable water——

Senator  DEMINT.  No,  my  question  was  an  alert  that  the  water 

had been contaminated——
Dr. BEMENT. Oh. Sorry. 
Senator DEMINT.—through—I mean——
Dr. BEMENT. Well, in that area, that would go more to our sensor 

arrays or——

ation? 

Senator DEMINT. Right. 
Dr.  BEMENT.—developing  advanced  sensors  for  that  kind  of  de-

tection and warning. 

Senator DEMINT. Doctor? 
Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  We’re  working  with  both  CDC  and  FDA—and 
there  is  actually  a  federal-wide  consortium,  something  called  Inte-
grated  Consortium  of  Laboratory  Networks  and,  actually,  we  have 
a formal MOU among basically all of the agencies that are involved 
in  this—with  the  vision  of  U.S.  Homeland  Security  infrastructure, 
with  a  coordinated  and  operational  system  of  laboratory  networks 
that  provide  timely,  high-quality,  and  interpretable  results  for 
early  detection  and  effective  consequence  management  of  acts  of 
terrorism  and  other  events  requiring  an  integrated  laboratory  re-
sponse.  This  is  to  make  sure  that  we  can  immediately  sample  po-
tential  attacks  at  home,  and  make  an  immediate  decision  whether 
there has been an attack, and how, what the level of contamination 
is and what kind of mitigation strategies may have to be taken. So, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

29

this  is  to  establish  a  nationwide  network  that  involves,  basically, 
many  agencies’  laboratory  capabilities  so  that  we  can  have  access 
and immediate remediation activities to address the issues. 

Senator DEMINT. Have we—in your meetings with Homeland Se-
curity—I’m  just  trying  to  determine  how  far  we’ve  gone.  We  know 
our  water  and  food  supply  is  threatened.  And  it  sounds  like  there 
could  be  monitoring  devices,  detection  devices,  that  might  help  us 
determine,  at  various  points  along  the  food  chain  or  water  res-
ervoirs—that we could actually detect contaminants before they af-
fected people. And I’m just wondering if we’ve taken our collabora-
tion  with  Homeland  Security  far  enough  to  actually  challenge  one 
of your agencies to develop a device that could do that. 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  There  are—I  mean,  the  issues  are  different,  of 
course,  whether  we’re  dealing  with  food  contamination,  food  poi-
soning, contamination, or water-contamination issues. Indeed, DHS 
is looking at specific technologies to do this. The idea with this con-
sortium was, once an attack, let’s say, is detected, can we quantify 
that and—so that we can evaluate whether it’s a major problem or 
a  minor  contamination  issue,  et  cetera.  But  I  don’t  think,  at  this 
point,  there  is  a  nationwide  network  of  detectors,  let’s  say,  located 
in different places. But I think—my understanding is, DHS is con-
sidering such a plan. 

Senator DEMINT. OK. 
Dr. SEMERJIAN. But I’ll be happy to provide you additional infor-

mation on that. 

Senator DEMINT. It would just seem that if—I mean, I can think 
of ventilation systems in buildings, food supplies, public schools, or 
grocery  stores.  If  these  things  were  somehow  where  we  had  folks, 
kind of, working to determine if current technologies could help us, 
with  sensors  and  monitors,  could  we  determine  if  we  had  a  prob-
lem? 

Dr.  BEMENT.  Well,  we—at  the  Foundation,  we’ve  been  working 
with  other  agencies  through  our  SBIR  and  STTR  programs,  which 
support small businesses, high-technology businesses, in developing 
new security technologies. And a lot of the work that is being done 
in this area is emerging from these small high-tech companies. And 
that’s  the  way  in  which  our  Foundation  would  be  making  a  con-
tribution in this area. And a lot of that work does deal with sensors 
and detection and warning systems. 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. May I add a couple of things? 
As I mentioned, this DCNet idea, which are local detectors, those 
detectors—and  there’s  11  or  12  of  them  in  this—right  in  this  city, 
one  protecting  this  area—they  can  measure  chemical  incursions  in 
the  atmosphere.  And  they’re  working  on  biological,  and  there  are 
some radiological sensors that could be added. So, that system has 
great  promise  for  metropolitan  areas  in  determining  instant  intru-
sion  by  some  foreign  substances  into  our  air  system.  That  system, 
if  it  were—we  were  looking  at  putting  them  in  New  York,  as  well. 
So,  the  technology  exists  for  us  to  do  that  for  our  air  monitoring. 
We  also  would  like  to  add  chemical  detectors  to  our—some  of  our 
buoys  along  the  coast,  because  that  would  allow  us—in  our  har-
bors—because  that  would  allow  us  to  get  a  leg  up  on—and  they 
have  not  been  added  yet,  that  I  know  of,  not  in  any  great  num-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

30

bers—but the technology exists to do that. We could work together 
to provide that kind of protection for water supply. 

Senator DEMINT. Senator Nelson? 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Admiral you mentioned that you’re working on getting the radios 
to  Alaska  and  to  Mississippi.  What  are  your  plans,  and  what  are 
you  looking  for,  in  terms  of  funding,  to  get  that  program  extended 
to other states—Nebraska, for example? 

[Laughter.] 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir. We understand that, after this 
pilot  program  starts—and  that’s  about  a  500K  program,  is  what  I 
have  right  now—that  those  radios  should  be  starting  to  arrive,  as 
I  mentioned,  in  September.  In  a  few  months,  we’ll  have  that  in 
place.  And  DHS  is  prepared  to  add  another  11⁄2 million  to  that, 
with—you know, continuing the distribution. So, to that, we would 
add  more  states,  more  rural  states  and  more  cities,  and  keep  on 
going.  Obviously,  I  don’t  have  a  figure  on  top  of  my  head,  that  it 
would  take  to  do  the  entire  country.  I’d  be  happy  to  provide  that. 
Senator BEN NELSON. Well, it might be helpful for us. Obviously, 
as  we  look  at  budgeting—not  this  year,  but  in  the  future—if  we’re 
short  on  the  budget,  you’re  not  going  to  get  the  radios  to  the  loca-
tions. 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir. 
Senator BEN NELSON. And I—it was right after the tsunami that 
we had some hearings in which we found out that some of the sen-
sor  buoys  that  were  locating  earthquakes  and  identifying  earth-
quakes,  give  us  some  advanced  warning  for  tsunami  activity, 
weren’t  functioning.  Do  you  know  whether  that  situation  has  been 
corrected? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I believe the situation that you’re refer-
ring to has been corrected. And let me specify, these were the new 
technology-six  buoys.  They’re  called  DART  buoys.  They  are,  in  my 
view, from my military days, they are Op/Eval buoys. They are first 
generation.  Three  of  them  were  down,  and  they  are  all  up  now. 
They have all been repaired and put back online. The next set that 
we  will  put  in  the  water  will  be  second-generation  technology.  We 
believe they’ll be much more reliable. 

I do want to point out that the ones that were not operational—
there was a—there were three buoys in place that were monitoring 
the  dangerous  areas,  the  most  dangerous  parts  of  the  Ring  of  Fire 
around the United States. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  as  it  turned  out,  we  didn’t  have  to 
test  them  more  closely  to  our—closer  to  our  shores  or  to  the  West 
Coast  or  anything  of  that  sort,  but  I  think  Senator  Stevens  was 
more than slightly disturbed by that fact, as was——

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.—Senator  Inouye.  So,  I’m  sure  they’ll  both 

be relieved, as you are, too. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  am  very  relieved  that  they’re  oper-
ational.  And  our  intention  is  to  put  spares  along  the  Alaskan  is-
lands. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  I  think  a  belt-and-suspenders  approach 

would be excellent. 

[Laughter.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

31

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir. 
Senator BEN NELSON. Dr. Semerjian, the World Trade Center re-
port  is  coming  out,  I  think—or  is  going  to  be  reviewed  by  NIST  to 
conclude  what  is  your  building  and  fire  safety  investigation  of  the 
collapse  of  the  World  Trade  Center.  And  I  wonder  if  you  could  tell 
us a little bit about where you are in that effort as it might relate 
to  the  way  people  design,  construct,  maintain,  and  use  buildings, 
so that it would help increase the safety and security, but particu-
larly structural integrity and safety for the future. 
Dr. SEMERJIAN. Yes, thank you, Senator Nelson. 
We  are  scheduled  to  release  our  report  on  June  23,  at  a  press 
conference  in  New  York  City,  where  the  specific  recommendations 
will  come  out,  but  we  are  already  working  with  the  organizations 
that  will  really  implement  the  recommendations  that  come  out  of 
this  study.  These  are  the  standards/codes  organizations,  organiza-
tions  such  as  American  Society  for  Civil  Engineers,  a  number  of 
other organizations. So—and that will be the first release of the re-
port. That will be the beginning of a public comment period before 
the  recommendations  are  finalized.  But  we  actually  already  have 
a conference scheduled for September, where the findings of the re-
port,  and  the  recommendations,  will  be  discussed,  and  the  imple-
mentations with regard to standards and codes will be discussed—
shared.  I  mean,  this  is  clearly  something  that  will—there  will  be, 
obviously,  a  lot  of  lessons  learned,  a  lot  of  recommendations  and 
implications for standards and codes. And we will be working with 
the  community  out  there  to  make  sure  that  the  results  are  inter-
preted properly and that appropriate action is taken as a followup. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  And  is  it  your  expectation,  certainly  with-
out  preempting  the  release  later  this  month,  that  there  will  be  a 
great  deal  of  followership  with  recommendations  that—from  your 
discussions  with  interested  groups,  such  as  engineers,  that  there 
will be a lot of interest in complying? 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  Yes.  There  has  been—I  mean,  our  process  has 
been  quite  open.  We  have  an  advisory  committee  for  our  National 
Construction  Safety  Team  Act.  Our  discussions  are  open,  so,  the 
community  has  been  listening,  following  the  discussions.  They 
haven’t  seen  the  final  recommendations,  but,  certainly,  they  have 
been  privy  to  all  the  discussions.  So,  there  has  been  quite  a  bit  of 
information sharing, and our staff have been briefing various com-
munities  about  our  findings.  And,  all  along,  we  have  released  our 
findings—not the recommendations, but the findings have been re-
leased,  so  the  community  is  aware  of  what  our  findings  are  and 
what  would  be  coming,  in  terms  of  recommendations.  So,  the  com-
munity has been following the process, and I think they have been 
quite receptive to a lot of recommendations. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  The  report,  will  that  make  recommenda-
tions that are, not only related to new construction, but retrofitting 
current buildings so that those that are in existence right now can 
be made safer with adjustments and some design work? 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  Yes,  there  are  some  recommendations  that  will 

impact existing buildings, also. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you. 
One final thing. Is it Bement? 
Dr. BEMENT. Bement. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

32

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Bement.  You  know,  we  talked  a  little  bit 
about research and development cutting back—being cut back with 
short funds, but I was a little concerned when I saw that the budg-
et  request  for  education  and  human  resources  in  the  budget  in-
cluded  $104  million  cut  from  FY05  to  FY06,  and  that  the  request 
for  math  and  science  partnerships,  which  is  off  24  percent  from 
2005,  and  less  than  half  of  2004.  Now,  you  may  have  an  expla-
nation  for  that.  And  so,  rather  than  my  criticize  you  for  that,  per-
haps I could just ask you to explain. 

Dr.  BEMENT.  Well,  the  math  and  science  partnership  program 
was  also  cut  last  year,  as  well.  This  is  the  second  year.  We  have 
retained  funds  in  that  program  to  continue  all  ongoing  efforts,  so 
the mortgages are protected. The thing that has been disabled, es-
sentially, is the startup of any new awards. So, we’re protecting the 
existing programs. 

There  has  also  been  a  concurrent  scale-up  of  activity  within  the 
Department  of  Education,  and  they  are  also  quite  active  in  math 
and science partnership. And there has been, all along, a very close 
working relationship between the National Science Foundation and 
the  Department  of  Education.  In  fact,  that  partnership  is  getting 
stronger with the new Secretary. 

So, we continue to work together to assure that the available re-
sources  are  used  as  effectively  as  possible  to  support  the  overall 
program in math and science partnerships. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  But  would  the  actual  reduction  in  your 
budget  be  picked  up  by  an  increase  in  their  budget,  or  are  we——

Dr. BEMENT. I think it’s pretty close to being equal. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  So,  you’re  not  really  looking  at  an  overall 

cut for this kind of education that’s so critical to the future. 

Dr. BEMENT. I believe that’s correct. 
Senator BEN NELSON. Well, thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
Let me go back to the National Weather Radio issue for a second, 
Admiral.  It’s  clear  that  it’s  going  to  be  years  before  we  get  these 
radios in all schools, and probably never, in any great penetration, 
into  homes.  Are  we  looking  at  other  ways  to  get  these  messages 
out?  For  instance,  I  know  it’s  very  easy  to  program,  on  your  com-
puter, something that’ll pop up. It would seem like it would be fair-
ly  easy  to  send  out  an  alert  via  e-mail,  the  Web,  or—are  we  just 
looking at other ways to deliver this message, rather than actually 
have a radio onsite? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes,  we  have.  We,  first  of  all,  put  out 
the  warnings  on  a  number  of  media,  so  they’re  not  just  going——

Senator DEMINT. Right. 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.—to  the  radios.  They’re  going  to  all  of 
our  radio  and  television  stations,  they’re  going  to  all  of  the  emer-
gency managers. So, the normal or, say, other means that we have 
for distributing this information are taken into account, so our—we 
have  three  or  four  redundant  systems  for  transmitting  this  infor-
mation, both nationally and internationally, for that matter. 

Some  of  the  interesting  things  that  are  going  on:  if  you  happen 
to  buy  a  Harley–Davidson  now,  you  can  get  Weather  Radio  right 
in  your  cycle.  So,  manufacturers  are  bringing  these  things  in  as  a 
permanent feature, or at least an alternative feature, that you can 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

33

buy,  either  in  car  radios—we’ve  been  looking  at  OnStar,  those 
kinds  of  things.  RCA-Thomson  has  worked  on  a  television  model 
that’ll be part of a standard package. 

So,  to  the  extent  that  we  can  make  it,  as  you  say,  part  of  other 
things—computers,  televisions,  radios—we  are  very  big  into  work-
ing on that project. 

Senator DEMINT. Senator Nelson, any other questions? 
Senator BEN NELSON. No. No, thank you. 
Senator  DEMINT.  Any  other  comments  for  the  Committee  that 

you’d like us to make part of the record, any of the folks here? 

Yes, sir? Doctor? 
Dr.  BEMENT.  I’d  like  to  go  back  to  food  security,  just  for  a  mo-
ment.  There  are  sensor  arrays  that  are  being  developed  under 
grants of the National Science Foundation that will track biological 
attacks of agriculture. Furthermore, through our program in micro-
bial  genomics,  we’re  studying  microbes,  the  genome  sequencing  of 
microbes  in  order  to  understand  how  to  develop  countermeasures, 
for  such  toxic  agents  as  wheat  rust,  soybean  rust,  rice  blast,  and 
even  anthrax.  So,  this  is  a  very  important  component  of  our  ongo-
ing  program,  not  only  to  detect  these  types  of  attacks,  but  also  to 
develop countermeasures against them. 

Senator  DEMINT.  One  more  quick  question  for  the  National 
Science  Foundation.  I  think  you  made  some  comments,  as  related 
to data mining, the ability to extract messages from large banks of 
information. Any other comments in that area? I know that’s some-
thing  that  we  hear  a  lot  about  from  the  intel  community,  looking 
for  possible  dangers  or  things  that  might  tip  us  off.  Are  there 
things going on there that would encourage us? 

Dr. BEMENT. Well, we have a number of joint efforts with the in-
telligence  community  and  also  with  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security,  where  they  contribute  funding  into  our  ongoing  efforts 
that  will  do  pattern  recognition,  will  understand  anomalous 
incidences that occur in data patterns, to detect intrusive behavior 
that  would  jeopardize  security,  and  also  would  do  what  we  would 
call  Internet  epidemiology  to  deal  with  worms  and  viruses.  And 
those capabilities become more robust with time, as we learn more 
about  them  and  as  we  also  try  and  develop  more  robust  systems. 
So, those are some additional activities that are going on. 

Senator DEMINT. Well, Senator McCain is back, and I think you 

had some questions for the panelists. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  And 

thank you for allowing me to ask a couple of questions. 

Admiral  Lautenbacher,  you’re  the  guy  that  said  we  had  to  sleep 
for 20 or 30 years before we’d know anything about climate change. 
According  to  the  General  Accountability  Office,  Admiral,  a  report 
of  April  14,  2005—have  you  seen  it,  concerning  climate-change  as-
sessment? The Administration did not meet the reporting deadline? 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I’ve  seen  a  few  articles.  I  don’t  remem-
ber the one about the reporting deadline. I’ve seen a few recent ar-
ticles on our—on the Administration’s reports. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

34

Senator MCCAIN. So, you don’t really pay much attention to gen-
eral  Government  Accountability  Office  reports  that  have  direct—
that  you’re  the  lead  organization—with  responsibility  for  it?  I  sug-
gest  you  do,  Admiral.  So,  since  you  haven’t  taken  the  time  to  read 
a  Government  Accountability  Report  that  directly  affects  you,  let 
me give you a couple of quotes. 

The  Global  Change  Research  Act  of  1990  required  the  Adminis-
tration to, among other things, prepare a national global-change re-
search  plan,  a  summary  of  the  achievements  and  expenditures  in 
the  area  of  federal  climate-change  research.  The  scientific  assess-
ment  is  to  be  prepared  at  least  every  4  years.  And  it  goes  on  as 
to what report. 

I’m sure you—I’d better read it to you, because I don’t——
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I have read that one, sir. I didn’t know 

which you were referring to. 
Senator MCCAIN. Oh, OK. 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  have  read  that  report.  I  understand 

Senator  MCCAIN.  All  right.  Basically,  they  say  you’re  not  com-

what it says. 

plying with the law. 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir. 
Senator MCCAIN. Are you complying with the law? 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  believe  that  we  are  complying  with 

the law, yes, sir. We have answered——

Senator MCCAIN. So——
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—some of the——
Senator  MCCAIN.  Well,  you’re  complying  with  the  law.  Did  you 
submit a scientific assessment on November 2004, 4 years after the 
previous assessment, as required by the Act? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  have  been  working  on  the  pieces  of 

it, and we believe——

Senator  MCCAIN.  Did  you  submit  it,  a  scientific  assessment,  on 
November 2004, 4 years after the previous assessment, as required 
by the Act? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. No——
Senator MCCAIN. Yes——
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—sir——
Senator MCCAIN.—or no? 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—we did not. 
Senator MCCAIN. You did not. But you’re in compliance with the 
law.  You  know,  you  are  really  one  of  the  more  astonishing  wit-
nesses  that  I  have—in  the  19  years  I’ve  been  a  Member  of  this 
Committee, Admiral, because, clearly, you’re in violation of the law 
when  you  didn’t  submit,  on  November,  a  scientific  assessment,  4 
years  after  the  previous  assessment,  as  required  by  the  Act.  I’d  be 
glad to send you the language of the Act. Nor have you shown any 
inclination  to  do  so.  Reports  are  now  expected  to  be  completed  up 
to  a  year  later  than  planned,  September  2006.  The  remaining  12 
reports are currently expected to be completed by September 2007. 
Do you have any response to that, Admiral? Probably not. 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir. We have—we have discussed it 
with  your  staff,  we  have  discussed  it  with  many  Members.  We’re 
trying to look at the best way to do this. It took 10 years to submit 
the first report. The limit was set at 4 years. This is a difficult re-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

35

quirement  to  meet  on  time,  and  I  think  we’ll  come  in  closer  to  it 
than the first report came in. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Did  you  ever  notify  this  Committee  that  you 

would not be able to meet the requirements of the Act? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  think  we  have.  I’ll  go  back  and  look 

at it. We certainly——

Senator MCCAIN. I don’t think you have——
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—had discussions with staff——
Senator MCCAIN.—Admiral, and if——
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—members. 
Senator MCCAIN.—If I was notifying the Committee of oversight, 

I might remember whether I did or not. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  did  talk  with  staff  members  about 

our ability to——

Senator MCCAIN. Did you——
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—do that, sir. 
Senator MCCAIN.—notify this Committee that you were not going 

to be in compliance with the Act? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I will go back and look at the memoran-

dums that we——

Senator MCCAIN. We have no——
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—submitted for the record. 
Senator MCCAIN.—record of it, Admiral. 
Well, Mr. Chairman, I don’t mean to drag this out, but the Gen-
eral—Government  Accountability  Office  says  that  Congress  and 
other  users  will  not  know  when  or  where  eight  areas  will  be  ad-
dressed, according to the law. So, we have an agency of government 
here, responsibility for the oversight of an issue that many people, 
including  Prime  Minister  Blair,  think  is  the  single-most—who  is 
now  visiting  our  President—single-most  important  issue  affecting 
the  world,  climate  change,  and  this  witness  in  this  agency  doesn’t 
care  enough  to  even  notify  the  Committee  of  oversight  that  they 
are unable to meet the statutory requirements of law. 

So,  I  have  no  choice,  Admiral,  but  to  try  to  act  legislatively  to 
try  and  see  that  you  do  obey  the  law.  You  know,  that’s,  kind  of, 
a  fundamental  around  here.  And  so—and  I  don’t  know  exactly 
what  those  courses  of  action  will  be,  but,  believe  me,  we  will  ex-
plore every one. 

And  I,  again,  want  to  express  my  deep  disappointment  at  your 
complete  lack  of  concern  about  future  generations  of  Americans 
who  are  affected  by  climate  change,  which  overwhelming  scientific 
evidence is now—let me just—because I’m sure you probably didn’t 
read  it—‘‘The  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  along  with  the  na-
tional  academies  of  ten  other  nations,  issued  a  joint  statement  on 
the global response to climate change. The scientific understanding 
of climate change is now sufficiently clear to justify nations taking 
prompt action. It’s vital that all nations identify cost-effective steps 
that  they  can  take  now  to  contribute  to  substantial  and  long-term 
reduction in net global greenhouse-gas emissions.’’

And all we’re asking from you is a report, and we can’t even get 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Senator  McCain,  and  I  want  to 
thank  all  the  panelists.  Great  information  today,  and  we’ll  be  fol-

that. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

36

lowing  up.  And  some  of  the  things  that  were  mentioned  that  you 
were going to keep us in the loop on, I greatly appreciate. 

Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 3:35 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today  to  examine  the  science 
occurring throughout our federal agencies that can help improve our homeland secu-
rity. 

I firmly believe that research and development at the various agencies within our 
jurisdiction  such  as  the  Coast  Guard,  the  Transportation  Security  Agency,  the  De-
partment  of  Transportation,  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration, 
and of course the three agencies that we will discuss today, have much to contribute 
in keeping the Nation safe. 

Today’s  hearing  will  examine  the  hard  science  and  operational  assets  of  three  of 
our  science  agencies,  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration 
(NOAA),  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST),  and  the  Na-
tional Science Foundation (NSF) that are improving homeland security. 

I would like to thank these agencies for their work. NOAA is leveraging its assets 
from NOAA weather radio to modeling to environmental monitoring to help our abil-
ity to prevent and respond to terrorism. 

NIST  has  become  a  resource  for  first  responders,  builders,  and  the  Department 

of Homeland Security when it comes to improving technology. 

The  NSF  is  funding  the  basic  research  that  may  not  come  to  fruition  for  ten  to 
fifteen  years  but  which  could  fundamentally  change  our  understanding  of  the 
human  dynamics  of  terrorism,  the  ability  of  computer  networks  to  protect  them-
selves, or the ability for sensors to detect multiple threats. 

Unfortunately, these agencies that contribute so much are asked to do so with lit-
tle  recognition  and  tight  fiscal  resources.  I  hope  that  today’s  ‘‘good  news’’  hearing 
can  help  us  build  the  case  for  NOAA,  NIST,  and  NSF  and  support  these  agencies’ 
broad and important work

Æ

(37)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:03 Mar 02, 2006 Jkt 025862 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25862.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

